PROTECTING  CHILDREN  ON  THE  INTERNET 

S.  HRG.  110–1103 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JULY  24,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

72–157 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

...............................................................................
Hearing held on July 24, 2007 
Statement of Senator Cantwell 
..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Rockefeller  ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

University of New Hampshire 

Allen,  Ernie,  President  and  CEO,  The  National  Center  for  Missing  &  Ex-
ploited Children  ....................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Finkelhor,  Dr.  David,  Director,  Crimes  against  Children  Research  Center, 
............................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Jones, Christine N., General Counsel and Corporate Secretary, The Go Daddy 
Group, Inc.  ............................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Nelson, Lauren, Miss America 2007  ......................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Neugent,  Lan  W.,  Assistant  Superintendent,  Technology  and  Human  Re-
sources, Virginia Department of Education  .......................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Page 
1 
39 
1 
1 
33 
2 
36 
3 
7 
7 

12 
14 

7 
10 

21 
23 
4 
5 

17 
19 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

PROTECTING  CHILDREN  ON  THE  INTERNET 

TUESDAY,  JULY  24,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:06  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Without  question,  the  Internet  provides  extraor-
dinary  benefits  to  our  Nation’s  children.  In  our  schools,  teachers 
use  the  Internet  and  computer  technology  to  enhance  instruction 
and  enrich  student  learning.  At  home,  children  can  use  the  Inter-
net  to  exchange  e-mail  or  share  pictures  with  friends  and  family, 
and to get information on virtually any subject imaginable. 

But  the  power  of  the  Internet  is  also  a  source  of  its  peril.  The 
New  Yorker  once  humorously  poked  fun  at  the  anonymity  of  the 
Internet,  commenting  that,  ‘‘On  the  Internet,  nobody  knows  you’re 
a  dog.’’  However,  there  is  nothing  funny  when  that  same  anonym-
ity  can  be  used  to  the  advantage  of  online  predators  and  others 
who would seek to harm children. 

In  addition  to  protecting  their  children  from  online  predators, 
parents also struggle with the challenges of shielding their children 
from the significant amounts of material on the Internet that aren’t 
suitable  for  children.  While  filtering  and  monitoring  technologies 
help  parents  to  screen  out  offensive  content  and  to  monitor  their 
children’s online activities, the use of these technologies is far from 
universal and may not be foolproof in keeping kids away from adult 
material.  In  that  context,  we  must  evaluate  our  current  efforts  to 
combat child pornography and consider what further measures may 
be  needed  to  stop  the  spread  of  such  illegal  material  over  high- 
speed broadband connections. 

These  are  all  difficult,  yet  critically  important,  issues  that  par-
ents and children face in an information age. If we search for a ‘‘sil-
ver bullet,’’ we will not find it. 

And I will have the rest of my statement made part of the record. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Without  question,  the  Internet  provides  extraordinary  benefits  to  our  Nation’s 
children.  In  our  schools,  teachers  use  the  Internet  and  computer  technology  to  en-
hance instruction and enrich student learning. At home, children can use the Inter-

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

net to exchange email or share pictures with friends and family, and to get informa-
tion on virtually any subject imaginable. 

But  the  power  of  the  Internet  is  also  a  source  of  its  peril.  The  New  Yorker  once 
humorously  poked  fun  at  the  anonymity  of  the  Internet,  commenting  that,  ‘‘On  the 
Internet,  nobody  knows  you’re  a  dog.’’  However,  there  is  nothing  funny  when  that 
same  anonymity  can  be  used  to  the  advantage  of  online  predators  and  others  who 
would seek to harm children. 

In addition to protecting their children from online predators, parents also strug-
gle  with  the  challenges  of  shielding  their  children  from  the  significant  amounts  of 
material on the Internet that are unsuitable for children. 

While  filtering  and  monitoring  technologies  help  parents  to  screen  out  offensive 
content  and  to  monitor  their  child’s  online  activities,  the  use  of  these  technologies 
is far from universal and may not be fool-proof in keeping kids away from adult ma-
terial. 

In that context, we must evaluate our current efforts to combat child pornography 
and  consider  what  further  measures  may  be  needed  to  stop  the  spread  of  such  ille-
gal material over high-speed broadband connections. 

These  are  all  difficult,  yet  critically  important  issues  that  parents  and  children 
face  in  an  information  age.  If  we  search  for  a  ‘‘silver  bullet’’  solution,  we  will  not 
find it. 

Rather,  our  efforts  must  rely  on  a  multi-layered  strategy—one  that  teaches  our 
children  about  safe  and  responsible  online  behavior;  one  that  encourages  industry 
action to develop tools that will aid parents in their efforts to restrict inappropriate 
material from their children’s access; and one that relies on swift and certain action 
by  law  enforcement  officials  in  finding  and  punishing  those  who  would  use  the 
Internet to harm children. 

We  have  a  very  distinguished  panel  of  witnesses  today  to  aid  our  review  of  this 

subject. I look forward to their testimony. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  May  I  now  recognize  the  distinguished  Senator 

from Florida, Senator Nelson. 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, to my distinguished Chairman. 
One of the most insidious, evil things that is happening in Amer-
ica  today  is  how  we  are  hooking  kids  through  the  Internet  to  ex-
plicit  material  and  Internet  pornography.  It  is  a  plague  upon  this 
country. And if we don’t take some overt steps to change the legal-
ity  of  this  activity,  we  are  going  to  poison  and  infect  the  minds  of 
our  children  that  will  have  results  that  will  last  for  generations  to 
come. 

Over  the  past  couple  of  years,  we’ve  passed  a  number  of  laws, 
such  as  the  PROTECT  Act  and  the  Adam  Walsh  Act,  and  made  it 
harder  for  online  predators  to  go  after  the  kids  online.  But  the 
predators are always a step ahead of us. 

We’ve seen, for example, the activities start to change from Inter-
net  chat  rooms  to  social  networking  sites,  and,  on  those  sites,  sex-
ual predators are often able to mask their identity and pose as chil-
dren, themselves, in order to solicit the children to reveal personal 
information and to provide pictures and so forth. 

As  we  work  to  address  these  threats,  we’ve  got  work  to  do,  but 
we also need to look at undertaking a comprehensive effort to edu-
cate  children  about  the  dangers  that  lurk  on  the  Internet.  A  few 
states,  Mr.  Chairman,  like  Virginia,  have  already  created  com-
prehensive  lesson  plans  and  curricula  to  teach  Internet  safety  in 
their  schools.  And  so,  I’m  working  with  others  on  this  committee 
to  formulate  legislation  that  would  create  a  pilot  program  to  pro-
vide school districts with grants specifically for Internet safety edu-
cation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

We teach our kids about school bus safety. We teach them about 
fire  safety.  We  teach  them  about  storm  safety.  Maybe—one  of  the 
most  insidious  diseases—we  ought  to  teach  them  about  Internet 
safety. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. I thank you, Senator Nelson. 
Now may I recognize the gentleman from West Virginia, Senator 

Rockefeller. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I like the fact that we’re having these hearings, and we’re having 
quite a lot of these hearings. And it was very interesting to me, in 
a hearing we had several weeks ago on a subject, I think, in which 
you  and  I  agreed  on,  that  not  many  members  of  the  Commerce 
Committee  agree  on.  And  so,  it  came  down  to  this—the  idea  of  in-
decency  was  not  simply—it  was  not  repellent  enough  to  them,  or 
violence was not repellent enough to them, or vulgarity was not re-
pellent enough to them, so that they were unwilling to overlook, at 
least  in  some  form,  the  First  Amendment.  And  it’s  a  little  bit  like 
if  you’re  attacked,  as  a  country,  and  you  decide  that  you’re  in  a 
peaceful  mood,  so  you’re  not  going  to  raise  an  army,  you’re  not 
going to fight back. I don’t think that’s the American way. And this 
meeting this morning is very much along the lines of trying to alert 
people  to  the  fact  that,  you  know,  child  pornography  sites  on  the 
Internet  are  exploding.  They  have  increased  1,500  percent,  accord-
ing  to  the  National  Children’s  Home  Report,  since  1988,  which  is 
quite a long time ago, but that’s also a pretty big increase. 

Everybody’s  always  talking  about  responsible  parents,  and  I 
think parents want to be responsible, and parents try to be respon-
sible,  where  they  can.  There  are  many  places  where  they  can’t  be, 
simply  because  of  the  situation  of  their  work  or  their  day.  Nobody 
seems to want to talk about the responsibility of those who produce 
all  of  this,  those  who  pay  for  the  ads  that  allow  all  of  this  to  go 
onto either the air, if we’re talking about television, movies, or onto 
the Internet. In one of the previous hearings, I deliberately showed 
some  very  vulgar  stuff  that  came  right  off  of  children’s-hour  tele-
vision,  and  they  said,  ‘‘How  can  you  possibly  allow  that  to  go  out 
to children at 10:30 in the morning?’’ Well, of course, it was on C– 
SPAN, but that didn’t make any difference to them. The point was, 
you  couldn’t  talk  about  anything  which  would  in  any  way  com-
promise the right of children to have their minds polluted, and pol-
luted, in fact, in such a way that many of them will be affected by 
it for the rest of their lives. 

So,  I  think  this  is  a  very  serious  subject.  I  think  it  has  a  lot  to 
do  with  the  future  of  America.  I  like  what  I  heard  from  the  good 
Senator  from  Florida,  Senator  Nelson,  what  he  was  saying.  And  I 
think it’s a very unfunny subject that’s going to require some rath-
er drastic action which is going to be displeasing to many. I’m quite 
prepared  to  displease  the  cable  industry,  the  movie  industry,  the 
networks, and all the rest of them, and the Internet industry. You 
know,  I  don’t  think  that’s  what’s  at  stake  here.  I  think  what’s  at 
stake  is  the  health  and  the  safety  and  the  disposition  of  our  chil-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

dren  as  they  grow  older  and  what  it  is  they  carry  in  their  minds, 
and what habits they develop. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
Before  we  proceed,  I  should  advise  you  that  I’ve  just  received  a 
note  from  the  leadership  that  votes  will  commence  at  10:30.  So,  I 
may have to call a recess at some later time. 

This morning, we have a very distinguished and lovely panel. We 
have  the  lovely  Lauren  Nelson,  Miss  America  of  2007;  Mr.  David 
Finkelhor, Director of Crimes Against Children Research Center of 
the  University  of  New  Hampshire;  Mr.  Ernie  Allen,  President  and 
Chief  Executive  Officer,  National  Center  for  Missing  &  Exploited 
Children; Mr. Lan W. Neugent, Assistant Superintendent for Tech-
nology  and  Human  Resources,  Virginia  Department  of  Education; 
and  Ms.  Christine  N.  Jones,  General  Counsel  and  Corporate  Sec-
retary, The Go Daddy Group, Incorporated. 

And  it’s  my  privilege  and  pleasure  to  call  upon  the  lovely  Miss 

America of 2007, Miss Nelson. 

STATEMENT OF LAUREN NELSON, MISS AMERICA 2007 

Ms. NELSON. Thank you very much, Senator. 
As  Miss  America,  I  have  the  opportunity  to  travel  around  and 
champion a cause that is very, very important to me. I travel about 
20,000 miles a month, speaking on the issue of Internet safety, be-
cause  I  had  a  personal  incident  with  the  issue  of  Internet  Safety. 
As  a  13-year-old  girl,  I  was  having  a  sleepover  with  two  of  my 
girlfriends, and we decided that we would get into a chat room. We 
were  talking  with  people  that  we  did  know  and  people  that  we 
didn’t  know,  which  was  our  first  mistake.  And  the  conversations 
continued.  We  were  approached  by  a  man  who  was  older  than  us, 
and  he  asked  us  the  question,  ‘‘ASL,’’  which  means,  ‘‘Age,  Sex,  Lo-
cation.’’  And  we  gave  him  the  information,  willingly,  not  knowing 
any  better.  So,  within  an  instant,  he  knew  that  we  were  girls,  he 
knew  were  females,  and  he  knew  where  we  were  in  Oklahoma, 
which  is  ultimately  enough  information  for  him  to  track  us  down. 
Luckily, that did not happen, but, about a week later, he sent inap-
propriate pictures of himself, and then we alerted our parents, and 
they alerted the proper authorities. 

These stories happen all the time, and most kids are not as lucky 
as  I  was  and  as  my  friends  were.  Seventeen  million  children  be-
tween  the  ages  of  13  and  17  are  online,  and  one  in  five  of  those 
children  are  approached  every  day  by  an  online  predator.  As  you 
said, social networking sites and chat rooms and instant messaging 
are  huge  on  the  Internet,  and  it’s  huge  for  our  kids.  Seventy-one 
percent  of  kids  have  a  social  networking  site;  64  percent  of  those 
kids actually post pictures and videos of themselves on those sites; 
and  over  half  of  them  leave  information  on  the  Internet  about 
where  they’re  located  and  where  they  live.  And  this  is  part  of  the 
problem. 

As  I  said,  through  my  travels  I’ve  had  the  opportunities  to  meet 
with  Ernie  Allen,  at  the  National  Center  for  Missing  &  Exploited 
Children, and I’ve also been introduced to John Walsh, who is also 
a  huge  champion  of  this  issue.  After  my  introduction  to  John 
Walsh,  I  had  the  opportunity  to  work  with  the  America’s  Most 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

Wanted  television  show  and  do  a  sting  operation.  And,  as  my  par-
ticipation  in  the  sting  operation,  I  ultimately  was  the  14-year-old 
decoy at the sting house. I chatted online with these men, I talked 
on  the  phone  with  them  and  was  the  14-year-old  girl  that  met 
them  at  the  door  that  they  followed  into  the  house.  So,  I’ve  gotten 
to see, from all points of view, how this issue affects kids and how 
it affects these people that are involved with it. 

Through  my  participation  with  that  operation,  I  learned  a  little 
bit  more  about  how  predators  behave.  They  prey  on  the  most  vul-
nerable of our children, the kids that are having problems at home. 
Maybe  they  don’t  have  friends  at  school.  But  these  kids  divulge 
this information, and these predators know that, and they use emo-
tional  tactics  to  get  in  there  and  to  make  sure  that  they  lay  the 
groundwork  to  make  them  comfortable  with  themselves  so  that 
they  can  get  more  information  with  them  and  ultimately  meet 
them in person. 

I’ve also had the opportunity to work with Cox Communications, 
and,  just  last  month,  had  the  opportunity  to  be  at  the  Teen  Sum-
mit, where we had 14 kids from 14 different States across the U.S. 
come  and  tell  us  a  little  bit  about  their  Internet  habits,  what  they 
were worried about, and what they wanted us to do, as adults. And 
one of the neatest things that we found that day was that the kids 
actually  want  parents  to  be  involved  with  what  they’re  doing  on 
the  Internet,  they  want  their  parents  to  ask  questions,  but  they 
want  their  parents  to  know  how  to  ask  the  questions,  and  not  to 
make it an interrogation. 

We  also  learned  that  cyber-bullying  is  a  huge  problem.  Not  only 
do  we  have  to  worry  about,  now,  predators,  but  we  also  have  to 
worry  about  kids  and  how  they’re  using  the  Internet.  There  was  a 
story that I recently read, that a child was being cyber-bullied, and 
he actually committed suicide because of it, and his parents had no 
idea  what  was  going  on.  Cyber-bullying  is  a  rampant  problem  on 
the Internet. 

So,  I’m  here  today  to  urge  you  to  implement  mandatory  edu-
cation for our children about Internet safety. I know that computer 
classes are in high schools, are in even middle schools, and they’re 
learning ways to use the computer. Why not implement some Inter-
net  education  so  that  they  know  the  dangers,  also  the  opportuni-
ties,  of  the  Internet,  but  also  learn  how  to  be  courteous  cyber  citi-
zens. We don’t allow our children to cross the street without know-
ing how to do it. We don’t allow our children to drive a car without 
giving  them  proper  education.  We  shouldn’t  allow  them  to  go  on 
the Internet without knowing the dangers and the opportunities at 
the same time. 

I  feel  that  it’s  the  responsibility  of  kids,  of  parents,  of  schools, 

and of government officials to make a change in this problem. 

So, thank you for having me here. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Nelson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LAUREN NELSON, MISS AMERICA 2007 

My  name  is  Lauren  Nelson  and  as  Miss  America  2007,  I  am  proud  to  be  here 
today  to  discuss  the  issue  of  Protecting  Children  on  the  Internet.  This  is  a  subject 
that has personally touched my life. When I was 13 years old, my friends and I were 
approached on the Internet through a chat room. We were young and did not know 
of the dangers of the internet, so we provided this person with our names, ages, gen-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

der, and our home addresses. A few days later, the individual sent us inappropriate 
photos. We were shocked and disgusted. We then told our parents, who immediately 
addressed  this  incident  and  reported  it  to  the  proper  authorities,  and  luckily  we 
were able to avoid a potentially dangerous situation. 

Not all children are as lucky as my friends and I were. 
As  Miss  America  2007,  I  have  made  this  issue  my  personal  platform  and  I  am 
here  today  to  champion  this  cause.  During  my  year  of  service,  I  am  visiting  cities 
across  the  country,  speaking  to  parents,  children  and  the  media  about  the  dangers 
of the Internet and the ways we can incorporate Internet Safety into our children’s 
lives. 

Back  in  the  April,  I  had  the  opportunity  to  meet  with  the  National  Center  for 
Missing  and  Exploited  Children  who  shared  with  me  their  knowledge  of  Internet 
crimes  against  children.  They  introduced  me  to  John  Walsh  and  the  television  pro-
ducers  for  Americas  Most  Wanted.  After  meeting  with  the  producers  of  AMW,  my 
commitment  grew  even  stronger  to  do  something  that  would  bring  national  atten-
tion  to  this  issue  and  get  people  talking  about  ways  to  stop  these  horrible  crimes 
against children. 

When  I  heard  about  the  Sting  Operation  being  conducted  by  the  Suffolk  County 
Police  Department  and  America’s  Most  Wanted,  I  immediately  wanted  to  get  in-
volved.  My  role  in  the  Sting  Operation  was  to  pose  as  a  14-year-old  girl.  I  would 
visit  chat  rooms  and  wait  to  be  approached.  It  was  shocking  to  me  how  quickly  a 
benign  conversation  would  turn  sexual.  The  suggestions  these  men  were  making 
coupled with the fact that they thought they were chatting with a 14-year old, turns 
my  stomach  to  this  day.  It  was  incredibly  disturbing  to  me  how  young  teens  can 
so easily be approached on the Internet and ultimately, meet face to face with very 
dangerous  individuals  who  disguise  themselves  through  the  veil  of  the  computer. 
Eleven predators showed up in person during our Sting Operation . . . and this can 
not be tolerated in our society. 

Upon my last visit to D.C., I had the opportunity to be a part of the Teen Summit 
on  Internet  Safety  with  John  Walsh  and  we  were  amazed  at  the  teens’  responses 
to  the  questions  regarding  their  Internet  habits.  Can  you  believe  that  one  out  of 
fourteen teens gives out their personal information on the Internet without knowing 
who they are chatting with? 

It  is  clear  that  our  teens  are  not  adequately  educated  on  the  dangers  that  the 
Internet  can  pose  or  the  consequences  they  may  face  by  sharing  personal  informa-
tion with strangers. That is the reason I am here today. 

I  believe  it  is  time  to  government  to  get  involved  and  provide  mandatory  edu-
cation  for  all  of  our  children.  We  need  to  begin  educating  children  as  early  as  pos-
sible.  We  have  all  heard  someone  say  ‘‘My  kids/grandkids  are  quicker  on  the  com-
puter  then  I  am.’’  It’s  so  true.  Kids  today  are  growing  up  using  computers  from  a 
very early age and using them on a daily basis. We don’t allow our children to ride 
their  bikes  without  first  teaching  them  about  proper  safety  and  we  shouldn’t  let 
them  use  the  computer  and  access  the  Internet  without  taking  the  same  pre-
cautions. 

I am here today to ask you to please implement mandatory education on Internet 
Safety for all of our children. There should be a mandatory class on Internet safety 
that  teaches  children  about  how  to  use  the  internet,  the  potential  dangers  of  the 
internet, and how to avoid these dangers. 

As students become more proficient on the computer, they should be taught about 
the various networking sites and chat rooms, and the problems that can occur when 
they mis-use these sites. 

Lastly,  they  should  also  learn  about  being  responsible  cyber  citizens.  The  issue 
of cyber-bullying is a growing problem in our schools today and it must be addressed 
now.  The  bullies  have  moved  from  the  playgrounds  to  the  internet,  and  this  new 
form of harassment cannot be tolerated. 

Through proper education, awareness and a national effort supported by our legis-
lators, we can all begin to make a difference. I sincerely hope that by using my voice 
as Miss America to bring awareness to this subject, that the message of the impor-
tance of Internet Safety education for our children will be heard. Thank you. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Ms.  Nelson,  I’ve  been  in  the  Government  for 
many  years,  and,  during  that  period,  I’ve  heard  over  1,000  wit-
nesses, and, without question, your testimony is one of the most in-
formative and articulate. I thank you very much. 

Ms. NELSON. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Our next witness is Dr. David Finkelhor. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  Mr.  Chairman,  would  you  allow  me  to  put  my 

statement in the record, just—— 

The CHAIRMAN. Without objection. 
Senator STEVENS.—as though read? Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The Internet is a dynamic space where Americans turn to get information, do re-

search, and exchange ideas. 

Given the increasingly important role of the Internet in education and commerce, 
it  differs  from  other  media  like  TV  and  cable  because  parents  cannot  prevent  their 
children from using the Internet altogether. The headlines continue to tell us of chil-
dren who are victimized online. While the issues are difficult, I believe Congress has 
an  important  role  to  play  to  ensure  that  the  protections  available  in  other  parts  of 
our society find their way to the Internet. Since introducing the Protecting Children 
Online  in  the  21st  Century  Act,  my  staff  and  I  have  worked  with  a  wide  variety 
of  advocacy  groups  on  this  topic.  In  response  to  the  feedback  we  have  received,  my 
staff are currently circulating a new draft with four primary goals. 

The new measure would: 
• direct  the  Federal  Communications  Commission  to  identify  industry  practices 

that can limit the transmission of child pornography; 

• require  schools  that  receive  E-Rate  funds  to  provide  age-appropriate  education 
to  their  students  regarding  online  behavior,  social  networking  and  cyber-bul-
lying; 

• require  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  to  form  a  working  group  to  identify 
blocking  and  filtering  technologies  in  use  and  identify,  what,  if  anything  could 
be done to improve the process and better enable parents to proactively protect 
their children online; and 

• add  the  selling  or  purchasing  of  children’s  personal  information  in  connection 

with a criminal offense in the criminal code as an indictable offense. 

I hope the panelists can give us more insight on what we can do within the First 
Amendment  to  empower  parents  and  whether  this  bill  heads  in  the  right  direction. 

The CHAIRMAN. Please proceed. Dr. Finkelhor? 

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  DAVID  FINKELHOR,  DIRECTOR,  CRIMES 
AGAINST  CHILDREN  RESEARCH  CENTER,  HORTON  SOCIAL 
SCIENCES CENTER, UNIVERSITY OF NEW HAMPSHIRE 
Dr. FINKELHOR. Yes, thank you very much. Appreciate the invita-

tion to be here and your interest in this very important issue. 

I’m the director of the Crimes Against Children Research Center 

at the University of New Hampshire. 

Whenever new threats appear on the scene, like SARS or school- 
shooters,  it’s  really  crucial  to  characterize  them  accurately  and  as 
soon as possible, because first impressions are lasting impressions, 
and  it’s  often  hard  to  change  these  impressions  later  on.  We  need 
accurate  and  early  characterizations  to  get  people  focused  on  the 
right thing to prevent the spread of these dangers. 

Now,  in  the  case  of  Internet  safety,  though,  I’m  afraid  that  we 
may  be  off  to  a  poor  start  on  some  issues.  I  think  the  public  im-
pression  of  this  crime  is  really  not  in  sync  yet  with  the  reality, 
based on what we know from the research. And it’s this reality that 
I  think  needs  to  guide  our  public  education  as  we  get  around  to 
doing it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

The  public  image  of  this  crime  is  that  we  have  Internet 
pedophiles, who have moved from the playgrounds into your living 
room  through  your  Internet  service,  who  are  targeting  young  chil-
dren  by  pretending  to  be  other  children,  who  are  lying  about  their 
ages,  identities,  and  motives,  who  are  tricking  kids  into  providing 
personal  information  like  their  names  and  their  addresses,  or  who 
harvest  these  things  from  MySpace,  and  then,  armed  with  this  in-
formation,  these  criminals  stalk  children,  abduct  them,  rape  them, 
or worse. 

But, actually, the research suggests a somewhat different reality. 
And here’s what we’ve found now, based on hundreds of cases that 
we’ve  reviewed  from  national  surveys  of  law  enforcement  agencies 
and  two  large  national  studies  of  youth  Internet  users  themselves. 
Incidentally,  all  this  research  is  available  in  prominent  medical 
and  scientific  journals.  I  can  make  them  available  to  you,  if  you’d 
like. 

First we found that the predominant online sex crime victims are 
not young children, they are teenagers. And the predominant crime 
scenario  does  not  involve  violent  stranger  molesters  posing  online 
as  other  children  in  order  to  set  up  an  abduction  or  an  assault.  It 
turns out only about 5 percent of the online sex crimes against chil-
dren  involve  violence  when  meetings  occur,  and  only  3  percent  en-
tail  an  abduction.  And,  interestingly,  deception  is  not  a  major  fac-
tor, either. Only 5 percent of the offenders truly concealed the fact 
that  they  were  adults  from  their  victims,  and  80  percent,  by  con-
trast,  were  quite  explicit  about  their  sexual  intentions  toward  the 
kids in their interactions with them somewhere along the line. 

So,  these  are  not  primarily  violent  sex  crimes,  but,  rather,  I 
would  characterize  them  as  criminal  seductions  that  take  advan-
tage of common teenage vulnerabilities. The offenders lure teens to 
meet  them  for  sexual  encounters  after  weeks  of,  very  often,  quite 
explicit  online  conversations  that  play  on  the  teen’s  desire  for  ro-
mance, adventure, sexual information, and understanding. And, as 
Lauren said, these are often troubled youth with histories of family 
turmoil and physical and sexual abuse, as well. 

So,  to  take  a  representative  case,  Jenna,  a  13-year-old  girl  from 
a  divorced  family,  she  frequently  went  to  sex-oriented  chat  rooms, 
under  the  screen  name  ‘‘evil—girl.’’  There,  she  meets  a  45-year-old 
guy,  Dave.  He  flatters  her,  gives  her  gifts,  talks  to  her  about  inti-
mate things, and then drives across several State lines to meet her 
for sex; on several occasions, in motel rooms. Dave is arrested with 
her  in  one  of  these  rooms.  Jenna  resists  cooperating  with  the  po-
lice. 

And  many  of  the  Internet  sex  crimes  have  commonalities  with 
this case. In 73 percent of the crimes, the youth go to meet the of-
fender  on  multiple  occasions,  for  multiple  sexual  encounters.  Half 
the  victims  were  described  by  the  police  investigators  as  ‘‘being  in 
love’’ or ‘‘feeling close friendship’’ with the offender. In a quarter of 
the cases, the victims actually ran away from home to be with the 
offender. 

And  I  think  these  are  aspects  of  Internet  crimes  against  youth 
that haven’t been fully incorporated into our thinking yet, and they 
have lots of implications for prevention. So, for one thing, we think 
it  means  that  we  have  to  make  sure  our  messages  are  directed  at 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

teens,  teens  themselves,  in  language,  in  format,  and  from  sources 
that they relate to. We’ve directed a lot of our information, up until 
now, at parents; but, many of these teens are under limited paren-
tal influence. 

We  also  have  to  get  beyond  blanket  warnings  about  not  giving 
out personal information. Our research, in fact, has suggested that 
giving  out  personal  information  is  not  what  puts  kids  at  risk,  nei-
ther  does  having  a  blog  or  a  personal  website  or  a  MySpace  social 
networking site. What puts kids in danger for these crimes is being 
willing  to  talk  online  about  sex,  with  strangers,  having  multiple 
risky  activities  on  the  Web,  like  going  to  these  chat  rooms  or  sex 
sites,  or  interacting  with  a  lot  of  people  online  whom  they  don’t 
know.  It’s  the  kids  who  move  toward,  rather  than  away  from,  the 
first signs of danger that I think we need to be thinking about. 

So,  in  order  to  prevent  these  crimes,  we  have  to  broach  more 
awkward  and  complicated  topics  that  start  with  an  acceptance  of 
the  fact  that  some  teens  are  curious  about  sex.  They  are  looking 
for  romance  and  adventure  online.  We  need  to  talk  with  them 
frankly  about  some  of  the  risky  things  that  they  may  be  contem-
plating;  why  hooking  up  with  a  32-year-old  guy  has  major  draw-
backs, like jail or bad publicity or public embarrassment; why they 
should  be  discouraging,  not  patronizing,  sites  and  people  who  are 
doing offensive and weird things online, fascinating as these things 
might seem to them. 

We  also  need  to  do  things  like  making  it  easier  for  teens  to  re-
port the come-ons and the sexual picture requests. We need to em-
power  bystanders  to  take  action.  There  are  often  friends  or  online 
observers  in  chat  rooms  who  may  see  what’s  happening,  but  who 
today aren’t doing anything to stop it. 

We  could  also  do  things  like  task  some  of  our  Federal  agencies, 
like  the  CDC,  OJJDP,  organizations  like  the  NCMEC,  to  help  de-
sign  scientifically  grounded  prevention  programs  that  address 
these  issues  and  that  can  be  disseminated  to  educate  youth  based 
on  proven  effectiveness.  And  this  is  important.  I  don’t  think  we 
should  be  just  telling  people  to  do  prevention  without  providing 
solid  guidelines  about  what  really  works.  And,  unfortunately,  I’m 
not sure that we know, yet, exactly what works. 

We  also  need  law  enforcement  training,  so  that  they  know  how 
to  handle  these  cases,  and  how  to  deal  with  the  fact  that  the  kids 
in these cases are often reluctant, as witnesses, and make prosecu-
tion  difficult.  They  need  to  know  how  to  work  with  them  to  bring 
them along. 

We need training for school officials, mental health professionals. 
These  are  the  kind  of  people  who  have  contact  with  some  of  these 
at-risk youth before they get into trouble. 

And  then,  we  need  ongoing  research  just  to  keep  tabs  on  what 
kids  are  experiencing  and  also  what  law  enforcement  is  encoun-
tering,  because  one  of  the  things  about  the  Internet  environment 
is that it is a very rapidly changing one, and the threats and dan-
gers  can  morph  very  quickly,  and  we  have  to  stay  on  top  of  these 
changes.  We  don’t  want  to  be  responding  to  yesterday’s  problems. 
We don’t, also, want to be overgeneralizing from a single high-pro-
file incident. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

For  example,  I  think  we  could  use  an  annual  assessment  of 
threats to kids in the Internet environment, something like the an-
nual  Monitoring  the  Future,  national  survey  about  drug  usage, 
that  gives  us  clues  about  new  trends  in  drug  usage  that  may  be 
plaguing the youth population. 

But the prevention challenges here aren’t easy. Like discouraging 
kids  from  smoking  or  drinking,  simple  scare  tactics  really  don’t 
work.  The  challenge  requires  some  really  very  deft  maneuvering 
within  the  teen  psychology,  which  is  often  obscure,  to  figure  out 
what will stick there. And, in the meantime, we have to be cautious 
about  promoting  messages  that  may  simply  turn  teens  off  or  that 
betray a completely unrealistic take on the Internet, and that may 
make them less receptive to the authoritative sources that we real-
ly  want  them  ultimately  to  trust  on  this  issue.  I  don’t  think  we 
should  allow  a  sense  of  crisis  to  mobilize  us  into  misguided  cru-
sades. 

So,  I’m  saying  we  have  to  do  our  homework,  we  have  to  do  our 
research. So much happens online that’s hidden. But if we want to 
stop  these  Internet  crimes,  we  have  to  understand  the  details  of 
what’s going on. It’s as simple and as complicated as that. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Finkelhor follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. DAVID FINKELHOR, DIRECTOR, CRIMES AGAINST 

CHILDREN RESEARCH CENTER, UNIVERSITY OF NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Whenever  any  new  threats  appear  on  the  scene,  from  SARS  to  school  shooters, 
it is so crucial to characterize them accurately and as soon as possible, because first 
impressions  are  lasting  impressions,  and  it  is  hard  to  change  them  later.  We  need 
such  accurate  and  early  characterizations  to  get  people  to  be  focused  on  the  right 
things to do to prevent the spread of the danger. 

Now  in  the  case  of  Internet  sex  crimes  against  children,  I’m  afraid  we  may  al-
ready be off to a poor start. The public impression of this crime is not in sync with 
the reality of this crime based on what we now know from the research, the reality 
that I think needs to guide our public education. 
The public impression about this crime is that we have ‘‘Internet pedophiles″, who 
have moved from the playgrounds into your living room through your Internet serv-
ice,  who  target  young  children  by  pretending  to  be  other  children,  who  lie  about 
their ages, identities and motives, who trick the children into providing personal in-
formation  like  their  names  and  addresses,  or  who  harvest  it  from  MySpace;  and 
then  armed  with  this  information,  these  criminals  stalk  the  children,  abduct  them, 
rape them or worse. 

But  our  research  suggests  a  different  reality.  Here’s  what  we  have  found  based 
on  hundreds  of  cases  retrieved  from  national  surveys  of  law  enforcement  agencies, 
and two large national interview studies of youth Internet users themselves, all this 
research  is  available  now  in  articles  in  prominent  medical  and  scientific  journals. 
First, we have found that the predominant online sex crime victims are not young 
children, but rather teenagers. And the predominant crime scenario does not involve 
violent  stranger  molesters  posing  online  as  other  children  in  order  to  set  up  an  ab-
duction and an assault. Only 5 percent of the online sex crimes against children in-
volved violence when meetings occurred, only 3 percent entailed an abduction. 

Nor  is  deception  a  major  factor.  Only  5  percent  of  offenders  truly  concealed  the 
fact that they were adults from their victims and 80 percent by contrast were quite 
explicit  about  their  sexual  intentions  toward  these  kids  in  their  interactions  with 
them. 

These  are  not  mostly  violent  sex  crimes  but  rather  criminal  seductions  that  take 
advantage of common teenage vulnerabilities. The offenders lure teens to meet them 
for  sexual  encounters  after  weeks  of  very  often  quite  explicit  online  conversations 
that  play  on  the  teen’s  desires  for  romance  and  adventure  and  sexual  information 
and  understanding.  These  teens  are  often  troubled  youth  with  histories  of  family 
turmoil and physical and sexual abuse as well. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

Jenna  was  a  computer-savvy  13  year  old,  from  a  divorced  family  who  frequented 
sex-oriented  chat  rooms  under  the  screen  name  ‘‘evil—girl.’’  There  she  meets  a  45 
year old, Dave. He flatters her, gives her gifts, jewelry, talks about intimate things 
and  drives  across  several  states  to  meet  her  for  sex  on  several  occasions  in  motel 
rooms. When Dave is arrested with her, Jenna resists cooperating with police. 

Many of the Internet sex crimes have commonalities with this case. In 73 percent 
of these crimes, the youth go to meet the offender on multiple occasions, for multiple 
sexual  encounters.  Half  the  victims  were  described  by  police  investigators  as  being 
in  love  with  or  feeling  close  friendship  with  the  offender.  In  a  quarter  of  the  cases 
the  victim  actually  ran  away  from  home  to  be  with  the  offender.  These  are  aspects 
of Internet crimes against youth that haven’t been fully incorporated into our think-
ing. 

They  have  lots  of  implications  for  prevention.  For  one  thing,  we  think  it  means 
that we need to make sure our messages are directed at teens, in language and for-
mat and from sources they relate to. Teens themselves, not primarily parents. Many 
of these teens may be under limited parental influence. 

We  also  have  to  go  beyond  blanket  warnings  about  not  giving  out  personal  infor-
mation.  Our  research  with  youth  suggests  that  giving  out  personal  information  is 
not  what  puts  kids  at  risk.  Nor  does  having  a  blog  or  a  personal  website  or  fre-
quenting  My  Space.  What  puts  kids  in  danger  for  these  crimes  is  being  willing  to 
talk  about  sex  online  with  strangers,  and  having  a  pattern  of  multiple  risky  activi-
ties  on  the  web—like  going  to  sex  sites  and  chat  rooms,  and  interacting  with  lots 
of  people  there.  It’s  kids  who  move  toward  rather  than  away  from  the  first  signs 
of danger. 

So  to  prevent  these  crimes,  we  have  to  take  on  more  awkward  and  complicated 
topics  and  start  with  an  acceptance  of  the  fact  that  some  teens  are  curious  about 
sex and looking for romance and adventure online: We need to talk to them frankly 
about  the  risky  things  they  might  be  contemplating—about  why  hooking  up  with 
a 32 year old has major drawbacks, you know, like jail, bad press, public embarrass-
ment  ;  and  why  they  should  be  discouraging,  not  patronizing,  sites  and  people  who 
are doing offensive things online, fascinating as they may seem. 

We  also  need  to  make  it  easier  for  teens  to  report  the  come-ons  and  the  sexual 
picture  requests,  and  we  need  to  empower  by-standers  to  take  action—that  is,  the 
friends  and  the  online  observers  in  chat  rooms,  who  may  see  this  happening  but 
today do little to stop it. 

We  need  to  task  agencies  that  know  about  prevention,  like  CDC  and  OJJDP  and 
NCMEC,  to  help  design  scientifically  grounded  prevention  programs  that  address 
these  issues  and  that  can  then  be  disseminated  to  educate  youth  based  on  their 
proven  effectiveness.  We  shouldn’t  just  tell  people  to  do  prevention  without  pro-
viding  solid  guidelines  about  what  really  works.  And  unfortunately,  I  am  not  sure 
we that we know yet what really works. 

We  need  training  for  law  enforcement,  so  they  know  how  to  handle  these  cases 
and  the  often  reluctant  kids  whom  they  need  as  witnesses  to  prosecute  the  offend-
ers. 

We also need training for school officials and mental health professionals, so they, 

too, can help some of these at risk kids before they get into trouble. 

And  then  we  need  ongoing  research  to  keep  tabs  on  what  kids  are  experiencing 
and what law enforcement is encountering, because in this rapidly changing techno-
logical  environment  the  threats  and  dangers  can  morph  so  very  quickly.  We  have 
to  stay  on  top  of  them.  We  don’t  want  to  be  responding  to  yesterday’s  problem.  We 
don’t  want  to  be  over-generalizing  from  one  single,  high  profile  incident.  So  for  ex-
ample, I think we need an annual assessment of threats to kids in the Internet en-
vironment, something like the annual Monitoring the Future national survey about 
drug usage. 

The prevention challenges here are not easy. Like discouraging kids from smoking 
or  drinking,  the  simple  scare  tactics  often  don’t  work.  This  challenge  too  may  re-
quire  very  deft  maneuvering  within  the  teenage  psychology  to  get  the  message  to 
stick. And in the meantime, we need to be cautious about promoting messages that 
turn teens off or that betray a completely unrealistic take on the Internet and which 
may only make them less receptive to the authoritative sources that we want them 
ultimately  to  trust  on  these  issues.  We  shouldn’t  allow  a  sense  of  crisis  to  mobilize 
us into misguided crusades. 

So  we  have  to  do  our  homework.  We  have  to  do  our  research.  So  much  of  what 
happens online is so hidden. But if we want to stop these Internet crimes, we have 
to  understand  the  details  of  what  is  going  on.  It  is  as  simple  and  as  complicated 
as that. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

May I now call upon Mr. Ernie Allen. 

12 

STATEMENT OF ERNIE ALLEN, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

NATIONAL CENTER FOR MISSING & EXPLOITED CHILDREN 
Mr. ALLEN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Chairman,  let  me  first  express  my  gratitude  to  this  Com-
mittee,  which  I  know  has  examined  this  issue  and  discussed  this 
issue for some time. I was honored to appear before this Committee 
last  fall  in  a  similar  hearing  that  resulted  in  a  number  of  initia-
tives,  including  Senator  McCain  and  Senator  Schumer’s  SAFE  Act 
legislation, which we think provides a major step forward. So, we’re 
delighted to be here with you again. 

What  I  would  like  to  do  is  talk  briefly  about  what  we  have 
learned,  at  the  National  Center  for  Missing  &  Exploited  Children, 
about this problem. 

Since 1998, with the mandate of Congress, we have operated the 
CyberTipline,  the  911  for  the  Internet,  handling  reports  from  the 
public  and  from  Internet  service  providers  regarding  child  sexual 
exploitation  online.  Two  weeks  ago,  we  handled  our  500,000th  re-
port. And what we have learned is that this is a huge and evolving 
challenge for law enforcement, for the public, and for communities. 
The  challenges  include  technology  challenges.  For  example,  last 
year,  working  with  six  major  Internet  companies,  we  created  a 
technology coalition in an effort to develop new technology to iden-
tify  illegal  images  online,  and  interdict  them,  including  creating  a 
database  of  known  images  so  that  we  can  prevent  their  reaching 
consumers. 

Another  challenge  is  the  growth  of  digital  photography,  Web 
cams  and  the  ease  of  creating  images.  Dr.  Finkelhor  talked  about 
the  fact—and,  in  his  research,  demonstrates—that,  increasingly, 
many  of  these  images  are  self-created.  Kids  are  taking  photos  and 
distributing  themselves,  having  either  been  seduced  or  at  least  in-
sufficiently sensitive to the risks which they’re posing. 

In 1982, the Supreme Court of the United States said that child 
pornography is not protected speech; it’s child abuse. And, as a re-
sult,  through  law  enforcement  efforts,  it  largely  disappeared  from 
the shelves of adult bookstores and through the mail. What we now 
know is that it went underground, and, when it went underground, 
with the advent of the Internet, it exploded. I talk frequently about 
one  case,  generated  from  a  lead  we  received  at  the  CyberTipline, 
that  led  us  to  husband-and-wife  entrepreneurs  who  decided  to  go 
into the child pornography business. When the site was shut down 
and they were arrested, these people had 70,000 customers, paying 
$29.95  a  month  and  using  their  credit  cards  to  access  graphic  im-
ages of small children being raped and sexually assaulted. 

New  technology  has  enabled  child  pornographers  to  stay  a  step 
ahead  of  law  enforcement.  For  example,  many  distributors  of  child 
pornography  are  now  using  peer-to-peer  file-sharing  networks, 
which do not use a central server, depriving law enforcement of an 
identifiable Internet Protocol, or IP, address. 

Wireless  technology,  with  the  increase  in  connectivity  enabling 
people  to  access  the  Internet  through  wireless  devices,  has  in-
creased the size of this problem. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

In  1998,  this  Congress  mandated  electronic  service  providers  to 
report  child  pornography  on  their  systems  to  law  enforcement  via 
the  National  Center  for  Missing  &  Exploited  Children.  The  good 
news is that today 327 electronic service providers are regularly re-
porting.  The  bad  new  is,  thousands  more  aren’t.  We  have  worked 
with  the  U.S.  Internet  Service  Providers  Association,  developing 
best  practices  regarding  guidelines  to  address  this  problem.  The 
major  ISPs  are  reporting,  but  our  concern  is  that  safe  havens  are 
being  created  in  nonparticipating  ISPs,  and  we  need  to  do  more 
about it. 

The  U.S.  Department  of  Justice  has  indicated  that  the  under-
lying  statute  is  flawed,  and  this  is  one  of  the  issues  we  discussed 
with  this  Committee  last  year.  We  need  to  fix  that  statute  so  that 
every ISP is required to report. 

There  is  another  missing  link.  Currently,  the  statute  constrains 
the  National  Center,  in  that  we  are  only  able  to  forward  those 
leads to U.S. law enforcement. One major ISP tells us, for example, 
that  much  of  its  system  is  used  in  Brazil.  That  provider  wants  to 
send  us  information  about  child  pornography  they  find  on  their 
customers’  accounts  to  Brazilian  law  enforcement.  We’re  precluded 
from doing that. 

There  is  another  missing  link  that  we’ve  discussed  in  the  past. 
Once  our  CyberTipline  analysts,  who  look  at  these  images,  triage 
them,  use  search  tools  and  techniques  to  try  to  identify  who  the 
sender, who the distributor is, and then provide them to the appro-
priate  law  enforcement  agency—once  they’ve  done  that,  there  can 
be  no  prosecution  until  the  date  and  time  of  that  online  activity  is 
connected  to  an  actual  person.  And  there  is  currently  no  require-
ment  for  providers  to  retain  connectivity  logs  for  their  customers 
on an ongoing basis. Some have policies on retention, many of them 
excellent. But they vary, are not implemented consistently, and are 
far too short a time to have meaningful prosecutorial value. 

We’ve  taken  some  new  initiatives.  In  the  area  of  commercial 
child  pornography,  through  the  leadership  of  Senator  Shelby,  who 
was  then  the  chairman  of  the  Senate  Banking  Committee,  in  the 
Banking  Committee,  we’ve  created  a  financial  coalition  against 
child  pornography  that  includes  29  major  companies,  including 
MasterCard,  Visa,  American  Express,  Bank  of  America,  Citibank, 
Google,  Yahoo!,  AOL,  Microsoft.  The  goal  is  to  follow  the  money. 
These  are  illegal  transactions  and  an  illegal  use  of  the  payment 
system.  Law  enforcement  gets  first  crack,  but  law  enforcement 
can’t  possibly  arrest  and  prosecute  everybody,  so  we’re  trying  to 
use  existing  law,  existing  banking  law,  to  stop  the  payments,  shut 
down  the  accounts,  and  put  these  people  out  of  business.  The  goal 
is to increase the risk and eliminate the profitability. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  don’t  come  before  you  today  with  a  quick,  easy 
solution  to  the  problem,  but  I  can  state  unequivocally  that  the  ad-
vent  of  the  Internet  has  provided  predators  with  means  to  entice 
children into sexual acts, and sustain—and create—a new lucrative 
illegal  commercial  enterprise  based  on  victimizing  children.  Fed-
eral,  State,  and  local  law  enforcement  are  more  aggressive  in  this 
effort  than  ever  before.  There  is  a  new  Justice  Department  initia-
tive, called Project Safe Childhood, which is attacking this problem. 
But  they  face  significant  barriers.  I  hope  that  you,  in  this  Com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

mittee, can help us remove some of those barriers and help us iden-
tify  and  prosecute  more  of  the  individuals  who  are  preying  upon 
children online. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Allen follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ERNIE ALLEN, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 
THE NATIONAL CENTER FOR MISSING & EXPLOITED CHILDREN 

Mr.  Chairman  and  distinguished  Members  of  the  Committee,  as  President  of  the 
National Center for Missing & Exploited Children (NCMEC), I welcome this oppor-
tunity  to  appear  before  you  to  discuss  crimes  against  children  on  the  Internet. 
NCMEC  joins  you  in  your  concern  for  the  safety  of  the  most  vulnerable  members 
of  our  society  and  thanks  you  for  bringing  attention  to  this  serious  problem  facing 
America’s communities. 

Let me first provide you with some background information. NCMEC is a not-for- 
profit corporation, mandated by Congress and working in partnership with the U.S. 
Department of Justice as the national resource center and clearinghouse on missing 
and exploited children. NCMEC is a true public-private partnership, funded in part 
by Congress and in part by the private sector. Our Federal funding supports specific 
operational  functions  mandated  by  Congress,  including  a  national  24-hour  toll-free 
hotline;  a  distribution  system  for  missing-child  photos;  a  system  of  case  manage-
ment  and  technical  assistance  to  law  enforcement  and  families;  training  programs 
for  Federal,  state  and  local  law  enforcement;  and  programs  designed  to  help  stop 
the sexual exploitation of children. 

These  programs  include  the  CyberTipline,  the  ‘‘9–1–1  for  the  Internet,’’  which 
serves  as  the  national  clearinghouse  for  investigative  leads  and  tips  regarding 
crimes against children on the Internet. The Internet has become a primary tool to 
victimize children today, due to its widespread use and the relative anonymity that 
it offers child predators. Our CyberTipline is operated in partnership with the Fed-
eral  Bureau  of  Investigation  (‘‘FBI’’),  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  Bu-
reau  of  Immigration  and  Customs  Enforcement  (‘‘ICE’’),  the  U.S.  Postal  Inspection 
Service, the U.S. Secret Service, the U.S. Department of Justice’s Child Exploitation 
and  Obscenity  Section  and  the  Internet  Crimes  Against  Children  Task  Forces,  as 
well  as  state  and  local  law  enforcement.  Leads  are  received  in  seven  categories  of 
crimes: 

• possession, manufacture and distribution of child pornography; 
• online enticement of children for sexual acts; 
• child prostitution; 
• child-sex tourism; 
• child sexual molestation (not in the family); 
• unsolicited obscene material sent to a child; and 
• misleading domain names. 
These leads are reviewed by NCMEC analysts, who visit the reported sites, exam-
ine  and  evaluate  the  content,  use  search  tools  to  try  to  identify  perpetrators,  and 
provide  all  lead  information  to  the  appropriate  law  enforcement  agency.  The  FBI, 
ICE and Postal Inspection Service have ‘‘real time’’ access to the leads, and all three 
agencies assign agents and analysts to work directly out of NCMEC and review the 
reports. The results: in the 9 years since the CyberTipline began operation, NCMEC 
has  received  and  processed  more  than  500,000  leads,  resulting  in  hundreds  of  ar-
rests and successful prosecutions. 

However,  despite  this  progress  the  use  of  the  Internet  to  victimize  children  con-
tinues  to  present  challenges  that  require  constant  reassessment  of  our  tools  and 
methods. As technology evolves, so does the creativity of the predator. New innova-
tions  such  as  webcams  and  social  networking  sites  are  increasing  the  vulnerability 
of  our  children  when  they  use  the  Internet.  New  technology  to  access  the  Internet 
is  used  by  those  who  profit  from  the  predominantly  online  market  in  child  pornog-
raphy and seek to evade detection by law enforcement. 

Today,  NCMEC  is  working  with  leaders  in  many  industries  involved  with  the 
Internet  in  order  to  explore  improvements,  new  approaches  and  better  ways  to  at-
tack  the  problems.  We  are  also  bringing  together  key  business,  law  enforcement, 
child  advocacy,  governmental  and  other  interests  and  leaders  to  explore  ways  to 
more effectively address these new issues and challenges. 

Last year, six Internet industry leaders, AOL, Yahoo, Google, Microsoft, Earthlink 
and United Online, initiated a Technology Coalition to work with us to develop and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

deploy technology solutions that disrupt the ability of predators to use the Internet 
to exploit children or traffic in child pornography. The Technology Coalition has four 
principal objectives: 

1. Developing and implementing technology solutions; 
2. Improving knowledge sharing among industry; 
3. Improving law enforcement tools; and 
4. Researching perpetrators’ technologies to enhance industry efforts. 

Bringing  together  the  collective  experience,  knowledge  and  expertise  of  the  mem-
bers  of  this  Coalition,  and  applying  it  to  the  problem  of  child  sexual  exploitation, 
is a significant step toward a safer world for our children. 

In  June  2006,  NCMEC  hosted  a  Dialogue  on  Social  Networking  Sites  here  in 
Washington, D.C. We did this to respond to the increased attention to these hugely 
popular  sites  that  permit  users  to  create  online  profiles  containing  detailed  and 
highly personal information, which can be used by child predators to forge a ‘‘cyber- 
relationship’’  that  can  lead  to  a  child  being  victimized.  This  vigorous  and  inform-
ative  discussion  brought  together  leaders  from  the  technology  industry,  policy-
makers,  law  enforcement,  academia  and  children’s  advocacy  groups.  We  learned  a 
lot  about  why  children  are  drawn  to  these  sites,  the  technological  capabilities  and 
limitations  of  the  site  operators  who  are  concerned  about  the  safety  of  their  users, 
and  how  law  enforcement  sees  these  sites  as  both  a  danger  to  kids  and  a  useful 
source of information in investigating cases. NCMEC is continuing to work with sev-
eral social networking sites on ways to make children less vulnerable. 

Another challenge is the widespread use of the webcam, which offers the exciting 
ability  to  see  the  person  you’re  communicating  with  over  the  Internet.  While  this 
has  many  benefits,  such  as  allowing  divorced  parents  to  have  ‘‘online  visitation’’ 
with their children in distant states, it, too, can be used to exploit children. The re-
ports  to  our  CyberTipline  include  incidents  involving  children  and  webcams.  Many 
children  are  victimized  inadvertently,  by  appearing  on  their  webcams  without 
clothes  as  a  joke,  or  on  a  dare  from  friends,  unaware  that  these  images  may  end 
up  in  a  global  commercial  child  pornography  enterprise.  Other  children  are  victims 
of blackmail, threatened with disclosure to friends and family if his or her ‘perform-
ance’ before the webcam doesn’t become more sexually explicit. Too much technology 
and  too  much  privacy,  at  a  sexually  curious  age,  can  lead  to  disastrous  con-
sequences. 

But  the  most  under-recognized  aspect  of  the  Internet  is  how  it  is  used  to  dis-
tribute  child  pornography.  It  is  not  an  exaggeration  to  state  that  this  is  a  crisis  of 
global proportions. 

Following the Supreme Court’s 1982 decision in Ferber v. New York, holding that 
child  pornography  was  not  protected  speech,  child  pornography  disappeared  from 
the  shelves  of  adult  bookstores.  The  U.S.  Customs  Service  launched  an  aggressive 
effort to intercept it as it entered the country and the U.S. Postal Inspection Service 
cracked down on its distribution through the mails. However, child pornography did 
not disappear, it went underground. 

That  lasted  until  the  advent  of  the  Internet,  when  those  for  whom  child  pornog-
raphy was a way of life suddenly had a vehicle for networking, trading and commu-
nicating  with  like-minded  individuals  with  virtual  anonymity  and  little  concern 
about  apprehension.  They  could  trade  images  and  even  abuse  children  ‘‘live,’’  while 
others watched via the Internet. 

Then  law  enforcement  began  to  catch  up,  and  enforcement  action  came  to  the 
Internet. The FBI created its Innocent Images Task Force. The Customs Service ex-
panded its activities through its Cyber Crimes Center. The Postal Inspection Service 
continued  and  enhanced  its  strong  attack  on  child  pornography.  Congress  created 
and  funded  the  Internet  Crimes  Against  Children  (ICAC)  Task  Forces  at  the  state 
and  local  levels  across  the  country.  There  are  currently  forty-six  ICAC  Task  Forces 
and  the  Adam  Walsh  Act,  enacted  1  year  ago,  will  create  ten  more.  Child  pornog-
raphy prosecutions and convictions have increased. 

But we should have no illusions about the impact of these initiatives on what has 

become a financially lucrative industry. 

The  Internet  has  revolutionized  the  commercial  markets  for  virtually  every  type 
of  goods  and  services  that  can  be  sold.  Unfortunately,  this  also  includes  goods  and 
services  that  subsist  on  the  victimization  of  children.  In  a  recent  case  investigators 
identified 70,000 customers paying $29.95 per month by credit card for Internet ac-
cess to graphic images of small children being sexually assaulted. In our experience, 
most of the consumers are here in the U.S., and we have found that of the 820 iden-
tified  victims  in  NCMEC’s  Child  Victim  Identification  Program,  a  startling  number 
of these children are also here in the U.S. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

A  recent  report  by  McKinsey  Worldwide  estimated  that  today  commercial  child 
pornography  is  a  multi-billion-dollar  industry  worldwide,  fueled  by  the  Internet. 
There  is  also  strong  evidence  of  increasing  involvement  by  organized  crime  and  ex-
tremist  groups.  Its  victims  are  becoming  younger.  According  to  NCMEC  data,  19 
percent  of  identified  offenders  had  images  of  children  younger  than  3  years  old;  39 
percent had images of children younger than 6 years old; and 83 percent had images 
of  children  younger  than  12  years  old.  Reports  to  the  CyberTipline  include  images 
of brutal sexual assaults of toddlers and even infants. These are images that no one 
here  could  previously  even  imagine.  But  they  have  become  all-too-common  in  the 
new  world  of  child  pornography  and  child  sexual  exploitation.  Children  have  be-
come, simply put, a commodity in this insidious commercial enterprise. 

New  technology  has  allowed  this  industry  to  stay  one  or  two  steps  ahead  of  law 
enforcement.  Many  distributors  of  child  pornography  are  using  peer-to-peer  file- 
sharing  networks,  which  does  not  use  a  central  server,  thereby  depriving  law  en-
forcement of an identifiable Internet Protocol (IP) address, which is key evidence in 
investigating  and  prosecuting  these  cases.  When  we  receive  these  reports  to  the 
CyberTipline,  it  is  almost  impossible  to  identify  the  perpetrators  responsible  for 
trading the illegal files. The anonymity of recent peer-to-peer technology has allowed 
individuals  who  exploit  children  to  trade  images  and  movies  featuring  the  sexual 
assault of children with very little fear of detection. 

Wireless  access  to  the  Internet  permits  predators  to  ‘‘piggyback’’  on  others’  wire-
less  signals,  trade  images,  and  remain  undetected  by  law  enforcement  because  of 
the  difficulty  in  locating  the  piggybacking  activity,  compounded  by  the  increasing 
use  of  wireless  access  cards  manufactured  overseas  which  use  radio  channels  not 
authorized  by  the  Federal  Communications  Commission.  Wireless  technology  has 
also  enabled  the  trading  of  these  images  via  cell  phone—making  the  operation  of 
this  enterprise  not  only  mobile,  but  also  able  to  fit  inside  a  pocket  and  easily  dis-
carded to avoid detection. 

Another  obstacle  to  overcome  is  the  reporting  of  child  pornography  found  on  cus-
tomers’  accounts  by  electronic  service  providers  (ESPs)  to  NCMEC.  Though  appar-
ently  mandated  by  Federal  statute,  42  U.S.C.  § 13032,  not  all  ESPs  are  reporting 
and  those  that  do  report  are  not  sending  uniform  types  of  information,  rendering 
some  reports  useless.  Some  ESPs  take  the  position  that  the  statute  is  not  a  clear 
mandate  and  that  it  exposes  them  to  possible  criminal  prosecution  for  distributing 
child  pornography  themselves.  In  addition,  because  there  are  no  guidelines  for  the 
contents  of  these  reports,  some  ESPs  do  not  send  customer  information  that  would 
allow  NCMEC  to  identify  a  law  enforcement  jurisdiction.  As  a  result,  potentially 
valuable investigative leads are left to sit in the CyberTipline database with no ac-
tion taken. Together with the U.S. Internet Service Providers Association (USISPA) 
we developed ‘best practices’ reporting guidelines to address this problem. The major 
ESPs are following these guidelines—for example, AOL, Microsoft, and Yahoo. How-
ever, these are voluntary rather than mandatory, so there is no enforcement mecha-
nism for those who choose not to follow them. 

This  reporting  statute  also  constrains  NCMEC  in  that  it  permits  us  to  forward 
the CyberTipline leads only to U.S. law enforcement. This is a real problem, consid-
ering  the  global  nature  of  the  Internet.  As  an  example,  there  is  a  portion  of  one 
major  ESP  system  based  in  the  U.S.  that  is  used  primarily  in  Brazil.  This  ESP 
wants us to send information about child pornography they find on their customers’ 
accounts to Brazilian law enforcement. But we are prohibited from doing so. 

There  is  also  another  necessary  yet  missing  link  in  the  chain  from  detection  of 
child  pornography  to  conviction  of  the  distributor.  Once  the  CyberTipline  analysts 
give law enforcement all the information they need about specific images traded on 
the  Internet,  there  can  be  no  prosecution  until  the  date  and  time  of  that  online  ac-
tivity  is  connected  to  an  actual  person.  There  is  currently  no  requirement  for  ESPs 
to retain connectivity logs for their customers on an ongoing basis. Some have poli-
cies  on  retention  but  these  vary,  are  not  implemented  consistently,  and  are  for  too 
short a time to have meaningful prosecutorial value. One example: law enforcement 
discovered a movie depicting the rape of a toddler that was traded online. In hopes 
that  they  could  find  the  child  by  finding  the  producer  of  the  movie,  they  moved 
quickly  to  identify  the  ESP  and  subpoenaed  the  name  and  address  of  the  customer 
who had used that particular IP address at the specific date and time. The ESP was 
not  able  to  provide  the  connectivity  information.  To  this  day,  we  have  no  idea  who 
or where that child is—but we suspect she is still living with her abuser. 

We think this is just not acceptable. 
One  of  our  new  initiatives  treats  this  industry  like  the  business  that  it  is.  Our 
goal:  to  eradicate  commercial  child  pornography.  Our  mission:  to  follow  the  money. 
This new initiative is the Financial Coalition Against Child Pornography. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

First,  we  will  aggressively  seek  to  identify  illegal  child  pornography  sites  with 
method  of  payment  information  attached.  Then  we  will  work  with  the  credit  card 
industry to identify the merchant bank. Then we will stop the flow of funds to these 
sites. The Coalition is made up of major financial and Internet companies, including 
MasterCard,  Visa,  American  Express,  Bank  of  America,  Citibank,  Microsoft,  Amer-
ica Online, Yahoo and many others. We are working to bring new members into the 
Coalition every day, especially international financial institutions. 

The  first  priority  in  this  initiative  is  criminal  prosecution,  through  referrals  to 
Federal,  state,  local  or  international  law  enforcement  in  each  case.  However,  our 
fundamental  premise  is  that  it  is  impossible  to  arrest  and  prosecute  everybody. 
Thus, our goal is twofold: 

1. To increase the risk of running a child pornography enterprise; and 
2. To eliminate the profitability. 

NCMEC is working hand-in-hand with both law enforcement and industry leaders 
to explore the best techniques for detection and eradication, and serves as the global 
clearinghouse for this effort, sharing information in a truly collaborative way. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  don’t  come  before  you  today  with  a  quick,  easy  solution  to  the 
problem  of  child  sexual  exploitation,  but  I  can  state  unequivocally  that  the  advent 
of  the  Internet  has  provided  predators  with  the  means  to  both  entice  children  into 
sexual acts and sustain a lucrative commercial enterprise that demands the heinous 
victimization of children. We suspect that the problem of child pornography will con-
tinue  to  increase  as  distributors  search  for  lower  risk  avenues  with  a  lower  possi-
bility  of  being  detected.  Federal,  state  and  local  law  enforcement  are  more  aggres-
sive  than  ever  before,  but  they  must  overcome  significant  barriers.  I  hope  that  you 
can help us remove some of those barriers and help us identify and prosecute those 
who are misusing the Internet for insidious, criminal purposes. Too many child por-
nographers  feel  that  they  have  found  a  sanctuary,  a  place  where  there  is  virtually 
no risk of identification or apprehension. 

NCMEC urges lawmakers, law enforcement and the public to take a serious look 
at  the  dangers  threatening  our  children  today,  and  to  move  decisively  to  minimize 
the risks posed by those who exploit new technology and target our children. 

Now is the time to act. 
Thank you. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Allen.  And  we’ll  try 

our best to do that. 

Mr. ALLEN. Thank you, Sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Our  next  witness,  Mr.  Lan  Neugent,  Assistant 

Superintendent for Technology and Human Resources. 

STATEMENT OF LAN W. NEUGENT, 

ASSISTANT SUPERINTENDENT, TECHNOLOGY AND HUMAN 

RESOURCES, VIRGINIA DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 

Mr. NEUGENT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  my  name  is  Lan 
Neugent,  and  I  am  the  Assistant  Superintendent  for  Technology 
and  Human  Resources  at  the  Virginia  Department  of  Education, 
and  past  Chairman  of  the  State  Educational  Technology  Directors 
Association,  SETDA.  I  am  very  pleased  to  be  here  today  to  share 
Virginia’s  perspective  on  education’s  role  in  protecting  children  on 
the Internet. 

House Bill 58, introduced by Delegate William H. Fralin, Jr., and 
passed by the 2006 Virginia General Assembly, was signed into law 
by  Governor  Timothy  M.  Kaine  on  March  7,  2006.  This  new  law 
made Virginia the first State in the Nation to require Internet safe-
ty  to  be  integrated  into  all  instructional  programs  statewide.  The 
law expanded the existing statute, which was adopted in 1999. The 
existing  statute  defined  acceptable  use  policies  and  practices;  the 
new  law  added  the  requirement  that  the  Superintendent  of  Public 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

Instruction issue Internet safety guidelines to school divisions. I do 
have a copy of this, and I do believe that it’s in your packet. 

Dr.  Tammy  McGraw,  Director  of  the  Department  of  Education’s 
Office  of  Educational  Technology,  and  her  staff  were  charged  with 
developing these guidance documents for local school divisions. The 
overall  approach  was  to  be  one  of  balance,  recognizing  the  need  to 
address the rights and the risk and the highlights and the benefits 
of  the  use  of  the  Internet  in  schools.  We  wanted  this  guidance  to 
reflect  our  belief  that  the  Internet  offers  unprecedented  access  to 
resources  that  can  enhance  learning,  research,  communication,  ex-
ploration  of  new  ideas,  and  expressions  of  creativity.  At  the  same 
time,  we  wanted  educators  and  students  to  understand  that  the 
dangers associated with the Internet are real, significant, and con-
stantly changing. 

To  develop  the  guidelines,  agency  staff  consulted  with  students, 
parents, educators, researchers, law enforcement officials, local and 
State and Federal representatives, and independent nonprofit orga-
nizations. These consultations, and an extensive review of research 
and resource materials, led to the following essential conditions re-
garding an effective Internet safety program: 

First,  Internet  safety  must  be  a  shared  responsibility.  Children 
and  the  many  adults  in  their  lives  all  play  important  parts  in  en-
suring  safe  and  responsible  Internet  use.  In  developing  the  guide-
lines  for  schools,  we  identified  key  issues  that  each  role  in  every 
group, from students to board members, should know. 

Second  thing,  Internet  safety  must  be  integrated  into  the  cur-
riculum  and  be  part  of  teachers’  daily  practice.  Our  work  showed 
that  Internet  safety  cannot  be  covered  in  a  single  lesson  or  a  unit 
by  use  of  a  single  program  or  resource.  The  Internet  is  pervasive 
in children’s lives. Strategies for ensuring safe and responsible use 
must reflect the many ways in which children experience the Inter-
net.  We  developed  a  guide  to  provide  teachers  with  strategies  for 
addressing Internet safety in the context of Virginia’s standards of 
learning. 

There  are  many  high-quality  resources  available  to  schools  free 
of  charge;  however,  schools  and  family  need  to  be  aware  that  they 
exist. We have reviewed many excellent resources that address var-
ious  aspects  of  Internet  safety  for  schools  and  families.  Our  great-
est challenges are helping schools identify the most appropriate re-
sources  and  assuring  that  they  have  the  ability  to  use  these  re-
sources effectively to cover the full spectrum of issues. 

Unlike  books  and  other  traditional  resources,  Internet  content 
changes  every  second  of  every  day.  As  a  result,  we  routinely  ap-
prise school divisions of new developments related to Internet safe-
ty.  Our  information  briefs  provide  summaries  of  the  most  current 
research. This is a continued process, due to the ever-changing risk 
of the Internet. 

Technical assistance and professional development must be avail-
able to school divisions as they design locally appropriate programs 
for  their  students.  Each  community  is  unique,  and  Internet  safety 
issues  tend  to  vary  greatly  from  one  part  of  the  Commonwealth  to 
another. We provide technical assistance as divisions move forward 
with designing their comprehensive Internet safety programs. Divi-
sions  request  assistance  from  the  State  Department  of  Education 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

on  a  wide  range  of  Internet-related  issues;  most  notably,  they 
struggle with the need to balance safety and security with instruc-
tional innovation. Social networking sites and blogs have been par-
ticularly challenging for school divisions. 

Virginia  is  fortunate  to  have  approximately  1500  instructional 
technology  resource  teachers.  These  are  folks  who  work  directly 
with  schools  to  help  integrate  technology  into  instruction.  These 
highly skilled educators receive extensive professional development 
and  support  from  our  agency.  They,  in  turn,  provide  training  and 
support  for  the  teachers  in  their  schools.  Library  media  specialists 
and  school  administrators  also  receive  development  through  con-
ferences  and  regional  events.  These  educators  are  essential  to  our 
Internet  safety  program  implementation.  Program  implementation 
must be monitored to assure quality and effectiveness. 

To assist division superintendents, we have developed a set of ru-
brics—that’s  also  in  your  packet—that  measure  the  degree  to 
which  each  division  has  adapted  its  acceptable-use  policy  and  im-
plemented an Internet safety program. These tools enable divisions 
to track their progress and determine technical assistance needs. 

Also,  public-private  cooperation  is  essential.  Protecting  children 
on the Internet is a daunting task, as you heard from many of the 
speakers, that requires the commitment of everyone. We have been 
particularly  successful  in  working  with  other  organizations,  both 
private and public, to advance Internet safety in Virginia. Attorney 
General  Bob  McDonnell  launched  an—Youth  Internet  Safety  Task 
Force,  comprised  of  leaders  from  prominent  Internet  companies, 
educators,  parents,  elected  officials,  and  law  enforcement,  to  iden-
tify solutions for the growing problem of sexual offenders and other 
criminals who use the Internet to target children and teenagers in 
the Commonwealth. This group’s work has formed the basis for sig-
nificant legislation and programs to advance Internet safety in Vir-
ginia. 

We  have  also  worked  closely  with  Bedford  County  Sheriff  Mi-
chael  J.  Brown  on  the  Operation  Blue  Ridge  Thunder  Internet 
Crimes  Against  Children  Task  Force,  as  well  as  Jane  Madison’s 
University Institute for Infrastructure and Information Assistance, 
the  National  Cyber  Security  Alliance,  and  other  organizations  de-
voted  to  Internet  safety  and  security.  Furthermore,  we  have  en-
gaged in direct dialogues with companies to help shape their prod-
ucts and their services to address Internet safety concerns. 

All of these efforts are converging toward one principal objective: 
maximizing the potential of the Internet, while ensuring the safety 
of  each  student.  Safe  and  responsible  Internet  use  is  at  the  fore-
front of our efforts, even as we develop cutting-edge Internet appli-
cations that range from online testing to studying astronomy in the 
daytime through a remotely controlled telescope in Australia. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Neugent follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LAN W. NEUGENT, ASSISTANT SUPERINTENDENT, 

TECHNOLOGY AND HUMAN RESOURCES, VIRGINIA DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  my  name  is  Lan  Neugent  and  I 
am  the  Assistant  Superintendent  for  Technology  and  Human  Resources  at  the  Vir-
ginia  Department  of  Education  and  past  Chairman  of  the  State  Educational  Tech-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

nology  Directors  Association.  I  am  pleased  to  be  here  today  to  share  Virginia’s  per-
spective on education’s role in protecting children on the Internet. 

20 

House  Bill  58,  introduced  by  Delegate  William  H.  Fralin,  Jr.,  and  passed  by  the 
2006  Virginia  General  Assembly,  was  signed  into  law  by  Governor  Timothy  M. 
Kaine  on  March  7,  2006.  This  new  law  made  Virginia  the  first  state  in  the  Nation 
to require Internet safety to be integrated into all instructional programs statewide. 
The  law  expanded  the  existing  statute,  which  was  adopted  in  1999.  The  existing 
statute defined acceptable use policies and practices; the new law added the require-
ment  that  the  Superintendent  of  Public  Instruction  issue  Internet  safety  guidelines 
to school divisions. 

Dr.  Tammy  McGraw,  Director  of  the  Department  of  Education’s  Office  of  Edu-
cational  Technology,  and  her  staff  were  charged  with  developing  a  guidance  docu-
ment  for  local  school  divisions  (See  Appendix  A*).  The  overall  approach  was  one  of 
balance,  recognizing  the  need  to  address  the  risks  and  highlight  the  benefits  of 
Internet use in schools. We wanted this guidance to reflect our belief that the Inter-
net  offers  unprecedented  access  to  resources  that  can  enhance  learning,  research, 
communications,  exploration  of  new  ideas,  and  expressions  of  creativity.  At  the 
same time, we wanted educators and students to understand that the dangers asso-
ciated with the Internet are real, significant, and constantly changing. 

To  develop  the  guidelines,  agency  staff  consulted  with  students;  parents;  edu-
cators;  researchers;  law  enforcement;  local,  state  and  Federal  representatives;  and 
independent  nonprofit  organizations.  These  consultations  and  an  extensive  review 
of research and resource materials led to the following essential conclusions regard-
ing an effective Internet safety program: 
Internet safety must be a shared responsibility. 

Children  and  the  many  adults  in  their  lives  all  play  important  roles  in  ensuring 
safe and responsible Internet use. In developing the guidelines for schools, we iden-
tified  key  issues  that  each  role  group—from  students  to  school  board  members— 
should know. 
Internet  safety  must  be  integrated  into  the  curriculum  as  part  of  a  teacher’s  daily 

practice. 

Our work showed that Internet safety cannot be covered in a single lesson or unit 
or  by  using  a  single  program  or  resource.  The  Internet  is  pervasive  in  children’s 
lives;  strategies  for  ensuring  safe  and  responsible  use  must  reflect  the  many  ways 
in which children experience the Internet. We developed a guide to provide teachers 
with strategies for addressing Internet safety in the context of Virginia’s Standards 
of Learning (See Appendix B). 
There  are  many  high-quality  resources  available  to  schools  free  of  charge;  however, 

schools and families need to be aware that they exist. 

We have reviewed many excellent resources that address various aspects of Inter-
net safety for schools and families. Our greatest challenges are helping schools iden-
tify the most appropriate resources and ensuring they have the ability to use these 
resources effectively to cover the full spectrum of issues. Unlike books and other tra-
ditional  resources,  Internet  content  changes  every  second  of  every  day.  As  a  result, 
we routinely apprise school divisions of new developments related to Internet safety. 
Our information briefs provide summaries of the most current research (See Appen-
dix  C).  This  is  a  continual  process  due  to  the  ever-changing  risks  on  the  Internet. 
Technical  assistance  and  professional  development  must  be  available  to  school  divi-

sions as they design locally appropriate programs for their students. 

Each  community  is  unique,  and  Internet  safety  issues  tend  to  vary  greatly  from 
one  part  of  the  Commonwealth  to  another.  We  provide  technical  assistance  as  divi-
sions  move  forward  with  designing  their  comprehensive  Internet  safety  programs. 
Divisions  request  assistance  from  the  state  Department  of  Education  on  a  wide 
range  of  Internet-related  issues;  most  notably,  they  struggle  with  the  need  to  bal-
ance  safety  and  security  with  instructional  innovation.  Social  networking  sites  and 
blogs have been particularly challenging for school divisions. 

Virginia  is  fortunate  to  have  approximately  1,500  instructional  technology  re-
source  teachers  who  work  directly  in  schools  to  help  integrate  technology  into  in-
struction. These highly skilled educators receive extensive professional development 
and  support  from  our  agency.  They,  in  turn,  provide  training  and  support  for  the 
teachers  in  their  schools.  Library  media  specialists  and  school  administrators  also 

* All  appendices  to  this  document  are  retained  in  Committee  files  and  can  be  found  at 

www.doe.virginia.gov. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

receive  professional  development  through  conferences  and  regional  events.  These 
educators are essential to our Internet safety program implementation. 
Program implementation must be monitored to ensure quality and effectiveness. 

To assist division superintendents, we have developed a set of rubrics that meas-
ure the degree to which each division has adapted its acceptable use policy and im-
plemented  an  Internet  safety  program  (See  Appendix  D).  These  tools  enable  divi-
sions to track their progress and determine technical assistance needs. 
Public-private collaboration is essential. 

Protecting  children  on  the  Internet  is  a  daunting  task  that  requires  the  commit-
ment of everyone. We have been particularly successful in working with other orga-
nizations,  both  public  and  private,  to  advance  Internet  safety  in  Virginia.  Attorney 
General  Bob  McDonnell  launched  a  Youth  Internet  Safety  Task  Force  comprised  of 
leaders from prominent Internet companies, educators, parents, elected officials, and 
law enforcement to identify solutions to the growing problem of sexual offenders and 
other  criminals  who  use  the  Internet  to  target  children  and  teenagers  in  the  Com-
monwealth.  This  group’s  work  has  formed  the  basis  for  significant  legislation  and 
programs to advance Internet safety in Virginia. 

We  have  worked  closely  with  Bedford  County  Sheriff  Michael  J.  Brown  and  the 
Operation Blue Ridge Thunder Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force as well 
as  James  Madison  University’s  Institute  for  Infrastructure  and  Information  Assur-
ance,  the  National  Cyber  Security  Alliance,  and  other  organizations  devoted  to 
Internet safety and security. Furthermore, we have engaged in direct dialogues with 
companies to help shape their products and services to address Internet safety con-
cerns. 

All of these efforts are converging toward one principal objective: maximizing the 
potential of the Internet while ensuring the safety of each student. Safe and respon-
sible  Internet  use  is  at  the  forefront  of  all  our  efforts,  even  as  we  develop  cutting- 
edge  Internet  applications  that  range  from  online  testing  to  studying  astronomy  in 
the daytime through a remotely controlled telescope in Australia. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
And may I now call upon Ms. Christine Jones. 
Ms. Jones? 
STATEMENT OF CHRISTINE N. JONES, GENERAL COUNSEL 
AND CORPORATE SECRETARY, THE GO DADDY GROUP, INC. 
Ms. JONES. Good morning, Chairman Inouye and Members of the 
Committee.  I’m  Christine  Jones,  General  Counsel  and  Corporate 
Secretary of The Go Daddy Group. 

Go  Daddy’s  principal  business  is  domain  name  registration.  We 
are  currently  the  largest  domain  name  registrar  in  the  world.  We 
have  something  on  the  order  of  22  million  domain  names  under 
management. We register a domain name once every 2 seconds, or 
less. And every single one of those domain names has the potential 
to  become  a  website  that  children  can  look  at.  The  amount  of 
data—as  you  mentioned  in  your  opening  statement,  Mr.  Chair-
man—online  is  simply  overwhelming,  and  we  cannot  look  at  all  of 
it to make sure that it’s OK. 

I  want  to  make  a  distinction  between  a  domain  name  registrar 
and an Internet service provider, just to make the point. For exam-
ple, if you wanted to register ChairmanInouye.com, you could go to 
Go Daddy and register that name, except that I already registered 
it,  in  anticipation  of  this  hearing,  so  now  you  can’t,  but,  neverthe-
less, that’s what we do. 

[Laughter.] 
Ms. JONES. OK. I’ll give it to you at the end of the day. OK. And 
Mr.  Stevens,  you  know  we  went  through  this  once  before,  as  well. 
A  domain  name—and  I  gave  him  a  domain  name,  for  the  record. 

[Laughter.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

Ms.  JONES.  A  domain  name  is  different  from  a  traditional  ISP, 
in  that  the  ISP  provides  the  access  to  the  Internet,  so  through  a 
DSL  line  or  a  cable  modem  or  even  an  old-fashioned  dial-up  con-
nection.  The  registrar  provides  the  entrance  to  establishing  the 
presence on the Internet. So, in your case, ChairmanInouye.com. 

We  also  host  a  substantial  volume  of  Internet  data.  That  means 
once  you  build  your  Website,  you  have  to  have  a  computer  to  put 
it  on.  We  provide  those  computers,  and  we  have  a  whole  lot  of 
them.  So,  we  end  up  seeing  a  lot  of  what  Ms.  Nelson  and  Dr. 
Finkelhor and Mr. Allen and Mr. Neugent talked about, on a daily 
basis. And we devote substantial resources to working with law en-
forcement, the National Center, other watchdog groups, and others, 
to help protect children from Internet predators. 

This can be frustrating, because it seems like the number of ‘‘bad 
guys’’  is  growing  faster  than  the  number  of  ‘‘good  guys.’’  And  we 
count ourselves among the ‘‘good guys,’’ by the way. 

Six years ago, when I joined Go Daddy, we had one guy, one em-
ployee,  working  on  these  types  of  issues.  Today,  we  have  two  full 
departments  that  run  24  hours  a  day,  7  days  a  week,  with  dozens 
of  employees  that  do  nothing  but  try  to  respond  to  issues  of  child 
pornography, child modeling, online harassment, cyber bullying, in-
appropriate content, outright child predators, like the one that Ms. 
Nelson  talked  about,  and  other  issues  affecting  children  and  their 
use  of  the  Internet.  It  is  a  huge  and  growing,  menacing  problem. 
And,  despite  our  efforts  and  the  efforts  of  many  of  my  esteemed 
colleagues  here,  there  are  still  grave  dangers  for  children  who 
spend time online, some of which Senator Nelson mentioned in his 
statement. 

Not one single day passes when we don’t have at least one exam-
ple  of  something  nefarious  happening.  I  mean,  every  single  day. 
These  include  school  districts  calling  us,  asking  us  to  remove 
websites where children are being harassed or threatened; parents 
calling  us,  because  their  children  have  been  approached  by  adults 
in  online  communication  communities;  videotaped  kidnappings— 
I’m  not  kidding  you—some  real,  some  not—that  we  work  with  the 
FBI on; and so on and so on and so on. 

There’s one very real example I wanted to share to make a point, 
that we must educate children and parents about the risks of shar-
ing information about themselves online. 

A  few  months  ago,  we  got  a  call  from  MySpace,  the  social  net-
working  community.  They  told  us  that  there  was  a  website  online 
that  had  about  60,000—that’s  six  with  a  zero,  60,000—MySpace 
user  name  and  passwords  posted  on  the  website  for  everybody  in 
the  whole  world  to  see.  MySpace  asked  us  to  take  that  website 
down. And we thought, OK, that sounds like a good idea, we don’t 
want  MySpace  user  names  and  passwords  out  on  the  Internet  for 
people to see. Most of those are run by children. A lot of those chil-
dren  put  information  about  themselves  out  there.  So,  we  took  it 
down. 

The  gentleman  who  ran  the  website  immediately  removed  the 
content.  We  put  the  website  back  up.  There  was  no  problem  with 
that. The entire thing lasted about an hour. But, I want to tell you, 
the  amount  of  outrage  and  backlash  that  we  experienced  as  a  re-
sult  of  taking  that  down  was  phenomenal.  To  this  day,  there  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

full-blown  websites  devoted  to  criticizing  our  decision  for  removing 
that content. 

I  don’t  know  what  people  would  have  had  us  to  do.  Leave  the 
user  names  and  passwords  out  there,  so  that  everybody  can  go 
stalk Ms. Nelson, like the gentleman that did that to her when she 
was 13? I don’t know, you tell me. 

Many  people,  I  think,  would  simply  rather  that  the  Internet  be 
a free exchange of ideas, with no rules and no oversight. They have 
little or no concern for the potential dangers this model creates for 
children. 

Because  so  much  of  the  burden,  therefore,  rests  on  parents,  we 
would  encourage  the  Committee  to  focus  on  ways  to  educate  both 
children  and  parents  about  the  dangers  of  using  the  Internet.  Ap-
parently,  protecting  your  MySpace  data  with  a  user  name  and 
password is not good enough anymore. 

I  would  say  most  major  corporations  want  to  do  whatever  they 
can to help. The legitimate ones, the ones that Mr. Allen is talking 
about, that his organization works with. But we need to have some 
tools, to be effective, as Mr. Allen mentioned in his testimony. 

So, Mr. Inouye, thank you so much for the kind invitation to tes-
tify.  We  are  grateful  that  this  Committee  is  once  again  looking  at 
this issue and for your leadership on this, and for recognizing that 
the  problem  of  exploitation  of  children  online,  generally—and,  spe-
cifically,  child  pornography—is  a  growing  and  unacceptable  prob-
lem that must end. And we are committed to working with law en-
forcement to see to it that that happens. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Jones follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHRISTINE N. JONES, GENERAL COUNSEL AND CORPORATE 

SECRETARY, THE GO DADDY GROUP, INC. 

Introduction 

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  I  am  Christine 

Jones, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary of The Go Daddy Group, Inc. 
Background 

to 

register 

Inouye, 

The Go Daddy Group, Inc. consists of eight ICANN Accredited domain name reg-
istrars,  including  Go  Daddy.com.  We  have  over  22  million  domain  names  under 
management, and are the number one domain name registrar in the world. GoDadd 
registers  a  domain  name  every  2  seconds  or  less.  Go  Daddy  is  also  a  large  hosting 
provider. 

if  you  wanted 

A  domain  name  registrar  serves  as  the  point  of  entry  to  the  Internet.  For  exam-
ple,  Chairman 
the  domain  name 
www.ChairmanInouye.com,  you  could  go  to  www.GoDaddy.com  to  register  that  do-
main name. A domain name registrar is different from a traditional Internet Service 
Provider  (ISP),  such  as  AOL,  MSN,  or  EarthLink.  The  ISP  provides  access  to  the 
Internet whereas the registrar provides the registration service for .com names and 
the  like.  In  short,  in  exchange  for  a  fee,  the  ISP  provides  the  means  by  which  an 
Internet  user  connects  to  the  Internet  via  a  dial-up  connection,  cable  modem,  DSL, 
or  other  connection  method.  A  registrar,  on  the  other  hand,  enables  Internet  users 
to  establish  a  web  presence  by  registering  a  unique  name  such  as 
www.ChairmanInouye.com. 

Once  www.ChairmanInouye.com  is  registered,  you  would  need  to  build  a  website 
and  find  a  place  to  store,  or  ‘‘host,’’  that  website.  Again,  you  could  go  to 
www.GoDaddy.com for storage, or hosting, services. A hosting provider differs from 
a  traditional  ISP  in  that  the  hosting  provider  supplies  space  on  a  computer  that  is 
accessible  from  the  Internet  rather  than  access  to  that  computer  which  is  provided 
by the ISP. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

How Go Daddy Deals With Online Child Predators 

The  Go  Daddy  Group  devotes  considerable  time  and  resources  to  working  with 
law enforcement to preserve the integrity and safety of the Internet by quickly clos-
ing  down  websites  and  domain  names  engaged  in  illegal  activities.  We  work  with 
law  enforcement  agencies  at  all  levels  and  routinely  assist  in  a  wide  variety  of 
criminal and civil investigations. We are also quick to respond to public complaints 
of spam, phishing, pharming, and online fraud and work closely with anti-fraud and 
security  groups  such  as  the  Anti-Phishing  Working  Group,  Digital  Phish  Net,  the 
National  Center  for  Missing  and  Exploited  Children,  and  CyberTipLine.  Go  Daddy 
has  made  it  a  high  priority  to  use  its  position  as  a  registrar  to  make  the  Internet 
a better and safer place. It is also a priority for me personally. 

My  staff  routinely  investigates  and  suspends  sites  involving  child  pornography 
and  exploitation  of  children  in  many  forms  and  degrees  of  severity.  These  include, 
but  are  not  limited  to,  the  following:  1)  sites  depicting  children  of  both  genders  en-
gaged  in  sexual  acts  with  adults  or  other  children;  2)  sites  depicting  children  nude 
or  exposing  inappropriate  areas  of  their  bodies;  3)  sites  advertising,  advocating,  or 
promoting  sexual  relations  with  minors;  and,  4)  sites  with  false  or  altered  images 
depicting  children  in  various  sexual  situations.  Our  investigations  have  also  uncov-
ered  sites  containing  photographs,  videos,  and  text  descriptions;  children  depicted 
in a sexually solicitous manner; sites that claim only to be ‘‘nudist’’ sites, but include 
pictures of naked children; and, even cartoon images depicting sex acts with infants 
and small children. We take each instance seriously and devote high priority atten-
tion to ensuring such websites are removed from our network, as described in more 
detail below. 
The Domain Name Registration Process 

The  domain  name  registration  system  is  entirely  automated.  There  is  no  human 
intervention  into  the  process.  Because  many  words  have  multiple  meanings  and 
combinations of words can be used for both legitimate and illegitimate purposes, no 
domain  names  are  automatically  prohibited  from  registration.  As  mentioned  above, 
Go Daddy registers a domain name once every 2 seconds or less. This makes it vir-
tually  impossible  for  a  human  being  to  verify  the  legitimate  use  of  every  domain 
name registration, particularly on an ongoing basis. To compensate for this, we have 
developed a notification system for reporting instances of all types of network abuse, 
including child pornography (hereinafter, ‘‘CP’’), to our Network Abuse Department. 
The Notification Process 

With  over  22  million  domain  names  under  management,  most  of  our  data  come 
from  third  party  complaints  or  notices.  The  Go  Daddy  Network  Abuse  Department 
can  receive  information  that  a  CP  site  may  be  residing  on  our  network  in  several 
ways: 1) direct complaint from a third party via email; 2) direct complaint via tele-
phone; 3) tip from Go Daddy employees who have either become aware of, or suspect 
the existence of, CP on a customer site; and, 4) notifications from CyberTipLine and 
other ‘‘watchdog’’ groups. 
The Investigation Process 

Once  Go  Daddy  is  made  aware  that  a  potential  CP  site  is  registered  through  Go 
Daddy,  we  immediately  investigate  to  determine  whether  there  is  CP  content,  and 
if so, whether that customer has other domain names resolving to the site with the 
CP  content,  and  whether  there  are  other  hosting  sites  in  the  customer’s  account 
which contain CP content. 

In  many  cases,  Internet  users  can  only  access  CP  content  by  supplying  a  paid- 
for  membership  user  name  a  password.  While  we  cannot  investigate  content  that 
requires payment to access, we do investigate all web pages found to be freely acces-
sible  to  Internet  uses  without  a  user  name  and  password  for  any  site  that  we  sus-
pect  may  be  involved  in  CP.  If  the  site  is  hosted  by  Go  Daddy,  we  may  also  access 
content directly in the customer’s hosting account to ensure we eliminate all CP con-
tent.  Often,  the  operators  of  websites  of  a  pornographic  nature  are  guarded  about 
images on publicly accessible landing pages and store the most offensive content in 
directories that site visitors can only reach with payment. 

After  we  determine  that  there  is  content  meeting  the  criteria  for  classification  as 
CP,  we  archive  a  screenshot  (in  the  case  of  a  registered  domain)  and  all  or  partial 
content  (in  the  case  of  a  hosted  site)  sufficient  to  demonstrate  evidence  of  CP  for 
future use in law enforcement investigations. 
The Reporting Process 

Once  Go  Daddy’s  investigation  is  complete,  we  report  the  offending  domain 
names,  websites,  and  registrant  information  to  law  enforcement.  We  give  law  en-
forcement  a  short  time  period  to  request  that  we  leave  a  website  in  tact  to  assist 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

in  their  investigations.  This  allows  authorities  to  expeditiously  gather  screenshots, 
downloads, WHOIS data, and other information necessary for further investigation. 
We  also  report  the  offending  domain  names,  websites,  and  registrant  information 
to  the  National  Center  for  Missing  and  Exploited  Children  (NCMEC)  via  their  on-
line submission and complaint area, CyberTipLine. 
The Suspension Process 

After the offending domain names, websites, and registrant information have been 
investigated  and  reported,  we  permanently  suspend  our  services.  It  is  important  to 
note that domain names are not suspended prior to the investigation and reporting 
processes, especially where domain names are not associated with an active website. 
It  is  very  difficult  for  us  to  suspend  a  domain  name  before  it  is  associated  with  an 
active  website  because  many  words  have  multiple  uses.  And,  if  there  is  no  CP  con-
tent  associated  with  a  particular  domain  name,  there  is  no  reason  to  suspend  the 
domain name itself because there is nothing unlawful about a domain name, in and 
of itself. 
How Go Daddy Deals With Private Domain Name Registrations 

Go Daddy offers privacy services for domain name registrations. A private domain 
name  registration  is  recorded  through  a  proxy  registrant.  This  enables  a  domain 
name  registrant  to  avoid  publication  of  their  personal  information  in  the  public 
WHOIS data base. We find that most of the users of the private registration service 
are  legitimate  users;  bad  actors  typically  do  not  want  to  pay  extra  to  hide  their 
WHOIS  data  when  they  are  probably  going  to  provide  false  WHOIS  data,  anyway. 
Most  CP  sites  do  not  have  privacy  protection  on  them.  More  often,  the  registrant 
simply provides false, but valid looking, WHOIS data, upon registration. 

The  registration  process  for  a  domain  name  is  exactly  the  same  regardless  of 
whether  the  customer  chooses  to  enable  privacy.  While  we  do  not  have  different 
rules  for  registering  a  domain  name  with  privacy,  we  do  use  our  Universal  Terms 
of  Service  broadly  to  cancel  privacy  when  the  Go  Daddy  Abuse  Department  deter-
mines it is being used for ANY improper purpose. Go Daddy also gives law enforce-
ment  the  proxy  registrant  information  on  private  domain  name  registrations  when 
they  are  investigating  a  domain  name  with  privacy.  In  the  case  of  a  CP  site,  this 
information is voluntarily provided to law enforcement during the notification proc-
ess described above. 
Child Pornography Statistics 

Go Daddy investigates thousands of domain names and websites each year for CP. 
The  number  of  unique  customers  investigated  in  the  past  twelve  months  was  ap-
proximately 1,500. (This number does not include the child modeling sites discussed 
below  which  are  growing  in  numbers  daily.)  The  number  of  domain  names  inves-
tigated each year is much higher than the number of unique customers investigated. 
One  unique  customer  may  have  many  domain  names  in  one  account.  Once  we  find 
out  about  potential  CP  in  a  customer’s  account,  we  look  to  determine  what  other 
products  they  may  have  associated  with  CP.  Many  times,  one  customer  will  have 
literally hundreds of domain names on account. In those cases, we suspend ALL the 
domain  names  with  CP,  not  just  the  one  upon  which  we  received  a  complaint  or 
notification. 

Importantly,  these  numbers  are  skewed  slightly  lower  because  many  times  when 
Go Daddy is the registrar, but not the hosting provider, the website content has al-
ready  been  removed  by  the  hosting  provider  by  the  time  we  conduct  our  investiga-
tion. This is a result of third party complaints being sent to both the domain name 
registrar  and  the  hosting  provider  at  the  same  time.  This  is  a  sign  that  many 
hosting providers take complaints of CP as seriously as we do and we are, of course, 
grateful  when  we  find  that  they  are  fully  cooperating  with  us  to  rid  the  Internet 
of CP content. 

Approximately  70  percent  of  the  sites  we  suspend  are  registered,  but  not  hosted, 
with  Go  Daddy.  This  means  that  in  about  70  percent  of  the  investigations  we  con-
duct,  we  find  that  the  website  content  itself  is  stored  by  another  hosting  provider 
and  Go  Daddy  provides  the  domain  name  registration  service  only.  Approximately 
80  percent  of  the  CP  websites  we  investigated  in  the  past  year  were  registered  to 
an individual or company in Eastern Europe. The most common areas were Russia, 
Ukraine, and Romania. Importantly, the majority of CP sites we investigated in the 
past  twelve  months  were  registered  fraudulently.  This  makes  identifying  the  exact 
nation of origin difficult, and brings into question the reliability of numbers we col-
lect. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

How Go Daddy Deals With Child Modeling Websites 

Much like CP websites, we routinely investigate and suspend sites involving child 
modeling. These include, but are not limited to, the following: 1) images of underage 
children posing in a manner intended to be explicitly sexy. (e.g., emphasizing genital 
areas or posing in situations easily identified with sex); 2) images of underage chil-
dren in adult lingerie; and, 3) images of children in states of partial nudity or very 
little  clothing  not  associated  with  normally  acceptable  situations.  Images  of  a  child 
in  a  bikini  swimming  at  a  pool  would  not  be  considered.  Images  of  the  same  child 
in a thong bikini laying on a bed and spreading her legs would be. 

As  these  sites  typically  do  not  rise  to  the  level  of  technical  CP,  we  classify  these 
sites as ‘‘morally objectionable,’’ a term taken from our Universal Terms of Service. 
We  tend  to  be  more  aggressive  than  most  registrars  on  child  modeling  sites.  We 
typically  remove  them,  even  if  we  can’t  find  CP,  because  our  experience  has  been 
that  the  operators  of  child  modeling  sites  tend  to  be  associated,  even  if  attenuated, 
with  CP  in  some  way.  We  also  remove  the  non-traditional  forms  of  CP  like  nudist 
sites and cartoon CP. 
The Domain Name Registration Process 

While  there  is  no  prohibition  against  registering  a  child  modeling  domain  name 
(because  there  is  nothing  illegal  about  the  domain  name  itself),  we  do  treat  child 
modeling  websites  in  a  manner  similar  to  CP  sites.  We  have  seen  child  modeling 
sites  with  more  and  more  frequency  over  the  past  year.  Almost  every  time  we  find 
a  child  modeling  site,  we  learn  that  the  customer  has  multiple  domain  names  spe-
cializing  in  child  modeling.  We  also  find  that  a  customer  who  runs  child  modeling 
sites  typically  also  has  CP  on  its  site  somewhere,  or  that  the  child  modeling  sites 
lead,  even  if  circuitously,  to  CP  on  another  site  the  customer  controls  somewhere. 
Based on our investigations, we have found that the vast majority of these sites are 
of little girls. 
The Notification Process 

All  child  modeling  website  investigations  originally  come  in  as  notification  of  al-
leged  CP  (as  described  above)  by  third  parties  or  employees.  When  we  are  notified 
of  a  child  modeling  site,  it  is  transitioned  to  a  child  modeling  investigation  as  soon 
as  it  is  discovered  to  be  a  child  modeling  site  not  containing  explicit  pornography. 
The Investigation and Reporting Process 

We follow nearly the same procedure for child modeling sites as described for CP 
investigations.  Because  the  child  modeling  sites  fall  squarely  under  the  charge  of 
the  NCMEC,  as  they  are  clearly  exploiting  children,  these  sites  are  also  reported 
to the NCMEC. 

The  following  example  demonstrates  the  importance  of  all  ISPs,  registrars,  and 
hosting  providers  taking  child  modeling  sites  seriously.  One  child  modeling  inves-
tigation we conducted recently uncovered a registrant engaged in CP. We discovered 
this  particular  customer  had  over  200  domain  names  attached  to  active  child  mod-
eling  websites.  After  following  our  standard  investigation  procedures,  Go  Daddy 
submitted  their  information  to  authorities.  Two  weeks  later,  this  customer  was  ar-
rested  and  indicted  on  multiple  counts  of  CP.  This  is  just  one  of  many  examples 
of a direct link between information we have provided and arrests for CP. 
Child Modeling Statistics 

We investigate thousands of domain names and websites each year for child mod-
eling.  The  number  of  unique  customers  investigated  in  the  past  year  was  approxi-
mately  780.  As  with  CP,  the  number  of  domain  names  investigated  each  year  is 
much higher than the number of unique customers investigated. This is because one 
unique  customer  may  have  many  domain  names  in  one  account.  Many  times,  one 
customer  will  have  literally  hundreds  of  domain  names  in  its  account.  In  those 
cases,  we  suspend  ALL  the  child  modeling  domain  names,  not  just  the  ones  upon 
which we received a complaint or notification. 

Approximately  60  percent  of  the  sites  we  suspend  are  registered,  but  not  hosted, 
with  Go  Daddy.  This  means  that  in  about  60  percent  of  the  investigations  we  con-
duct, we find that the website content is stored by another hosting provider and Go 
Daddy provides the domain name registration only. This statistic might tend to sug-
gest  that  child  modeling  operators  are  more  comfortable  using  the  services  of  a 
mainstream hosting provider than those who engage in pure CP, although we have 
no  independently  verifiable  data  to  support  that  suggestion.  Approximately  60  per-
cent  of  child  modeling  websites  we  investigated  in  the  past  year  were  registered  to 
an individual or company overseas, typically in European countries. Unlike with full 
blown CP, approximately 40 percent of child modeling sites we investigated and sus-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

pended  in  the  past  twelve  months  were  registered  to  an  individual  or  business  in 
the United States. 
Conclusion 

Thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye,  for  the  kind  invitation  to  testify  today  regarding 
protecting  children  on  the  Internet.  We  are  grateful  for  this  Committee’s  attention 
to  this  important  issue  and  for  recognizing  that  the  problem  of  online  exploitation 
of children generally, and child pornography specifically, is a growing and unaccept-
able  menace  that  must  end.  Go  Daddy  is  committed  to  taking  whatever  steps  are 
necessary and feasible to assist in ending this practice, and we would challenge our 
counterparts on the Internet to make the same commitment. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Ms. Jones. 
Senator Stevens? 
Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  would  not  be  able  to 
come  back  after  the  vote,  so  I  do  thank  you,  appreciate  the  oppor-
tunity. 

I’m  interested,  Ms.  Jones,  in  the  question  of  whether  or  not  the 
community  out  there  dealing  with  the  Internet  in  general  has  any 
idea of what type of an education program would work. 

Ms.  JONES.  There  are  many  conversations  that  happen  around 
this issue. And, as Mr. Allen said, there’s not one single silver bul-
let, there’s not one single simple solution. But, if you teach a teen-
ager  not  to  post  pictures  and  not  to  put  their  address  and  phone 
number,  not  to  put  their  hometown  on  the  Internet,  those  kind  of 
simple  solutions—I  mean,  basic,  fundamental  stuff—that  would  go 
a  long  way  toward  helping  kids  escape  some  of  the  predators  that 
are out to get them. 

I  think  Ms.  Nelson  made  the  point,  people  on  the  Internet  go 
after  the  weakest  link.  They  want  the  kid  that’s  easy  to  get.  So, 
if  each  child  knows,  ‘‘Hey,  you  know  what,  if  you’re  going  to  be  on 
the  Internet,  don’t  put  your  stuff  out  there,’’  that  would  go  a  long 
way to solving the problems that we’re talking about right now. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Is  there  any  way  that  you  think  that  the  sys-
tem  could  be  modified  so  that  parents  would  have  greater  control 
over children? 

Ms. JONES. Well, there are some proposals around that issue, for 
example,  the  dot-US  [.us]  country  code  top-level  domain,  which  is 
central to the United States. They have an area called dot-kids-dot- 
US [.kids.us], which is supposed to be used specifically for children 
on  the  Internet.  That  type  of  thing  would  work  for  smaller  kids. 
Teenagers, they’re not going to buy it, right? Because they want to 
go  out,  and  they  want  to  explore,  and  they  want  to  do  their  own 
thing. But, if you had some areas that were defined so that parents 
could know and monitor and get feedback and reports on every sin-
gle spot that their kid went to, every single chat conversation they 
had,  every  website  they  viewed,  I  think  the  parent  would  kind  of 
get  the  idea,  if  they  know  their  kid  was  talking  to  some  kind  of 
strange-sounding  person  in  another  State.  That  is  pretty  simple  to 
implement. Getting the word out and helping people to understand 
that that’s available, that’s the educational process that we’re talk-
ing about. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Is  there  agreement  on  the  panel  that  the  real 
problem  is  in  the  sub-teens,  rather  than  in  the  teen  level?  Teens 
have access to a lot more computers in school and in clubs and ev-
erything else. I think the sub-teen level ought to be the main target 
of any legislation. And is there agreement on that? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

Dr.  FINKELHOR.  I  guess  I  would  say  no.  I  think  that,  while  it’s 
important to educate the preteens about the dangers that they can 
encounter online, I don’t think that they are quite yet ready to un-
derstand  some  of  the  kind  of  risky  activities  that  will  really  get 
them  into  a  lot  of  trouble.  I  think  this  has  to  go  along  with  some 
of  the  information  that  we  give  them  when  they  start  to  be  inter-
ested  in  romance  and  taking  risks,  so  that  there’s  a  different  kind 
of  educational  package  that  we  need  to  target  at  those  teens,  and 
particularly  at  these  teens  who  are  inclined  to  take  risks  and  who 
may be having serious problems in their—— 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  was  talking  more  about  parental  control.  It 
seems  to  me  we  could  put  some  parental  controls  on  home  com-
puters,  but  I  don’t  think  we  can  go  out  to  the  stores  and  other 
places  where  teenagers  can  access  the  Internet  somewhere.  The 
sub-teens really don’t have that opportunity. 

Anyone else comment on that? 
Ms. Nelson, what do you think? 
Ms.  NELSON.  I  feel,  as  Dr.  Finkelhor  said,  I  think  that  we  can 
educate  our  teens  on  ways  to  stay  away  from  predators,  but  I  feel 
that  education  of  safe  Internet  usage  should  start  a  lower  level. 
Kids as young as 5 and 6 are using the Internet. If they knew sim-
ple habits, like, ‘‘Don’t talk to strangers,’’ just like you don’t on the 
street,  ‘‘Don’t  share  your  personal  information,  involving  adults  if 
you  feel  uncomfortable,’’  if  they  know  those  habits  at  a  younger 
age,  they  will  learn  to  be  more  responsible  Internet  users  as  they 
grow with age. 

Mr. ALLEN. Senator Stevens, let me add, I think there’s no ques-
tion that educational emphasis has to be put on the sub-teen group. 
Teens  are  tough.  And  what  we’ve  tried  to  do,  what  many  of  the 
groups  that  are  doing  such  great  work  in  this  area  have  done  is 
try  to  look  for  that  way  to  really  communicate  with  teens  on  their 
level,  that  they  understand.  The  second  part  of  the  message  is  to 
parents,  ‘‘Your  parenting  obligation  isn’t  over  just  because  your 
kid’s 13 years of age. They’re not virtual adults, they are still kids.’’ 
I think we have to continue to pound home the message on parents 
that, ‘‘You need to be involved in your kids’ lives, you need to talk 
to  them  and  communicate  with  them,  and  make  sure  you  under-
stand the kinds of challenges they’re facing.’’ 

So,  I  think  the  answer,  unfortunately,  has  to  be  multifaceted, 
comprehensive,  and  target  both  age  groups,  and  keep  parents  in 
the mix. 

Mr.  NEUGENT.  If  I  may  add  to  that,  in  education  what  we’ve 
found  is  that  many  of  the  teachers  that  are  working  with  children 
don’t have all of the skills that are necessary to help protect them, 
and  that’s  why  we’re  developing  the  Internet  curriculum,  so  that 
they  can  take  a  look  at  that.  And  we  do  find  it  pervasive,  all  the 
way  from  kindergarten  through  high  school.  There  are  unique 
issues with every age group, and the guidelines and the things that 
we’re  working  on  are  to  try  to  make  it  so  that  all  of  those  areas 
have  some  influence  over  that.  The  role  of  leaders,  the  role  of  ad-
ministrators  in  school,  the  role  of  the  people  that  influence  chil-
dren’s lives, is critically important as they start to work with it. 

One  of  the  things  we’re  trying  to  do,  for  example,  is  to  educate 
parents so that they understand how to check a log and see where 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

children have been, just as many of the panelists have said, some-
times  a  simple  thing  like  that,  parents  just  don’t  know  how  to  do 
that, and can’t track where their children have been. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Nelson? 
Senator NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
We  know,  on  the  basis  of  Mr.  Nugent’s  testimony  today,  what 
they’re  doing  in  Virginia  with  regard  to  education.  And  I’d  like  to 
ask  the  rest  of  the  panel,  what  do  you  think  are  the  kind  of  pro-
grams  that  will  work  the  best  in  order  to  educate  children  as  part 
of the overall curriculum? 

Ms. NELSON. As I said earlier in my testimony, they have the op-
portunity to be a part of computer classes, as young as the middle- 
age schooling. Taking time during those computer classes to imple-
ment  Internet  safety  education  is  one  of  the  ways  that  I  feel  that 
it  would  be  most  effective,  because  they  would  be  made  to  learn 
about  the  issues  of  the  Internet.  Kids  aren’t  always  going  to  want 
to hear these stories, they’re not like Ms. Jones said, they want the 
Internet to be a free place where they can express themselves. But 
if  they’re  made  to  learn  about  it,  if  they’re  made  to  be  safer  Inter-
net users, they will learn these rules a lot easier. 

Dr. FINKELHOR. I’d just like to make another pitch for what I see 
as  crucial  here:  research  on  this  issue.  I’m  not  sure  that  we  know 
what  the  best  prevention  message  is.  I’d  like  to  highlight  some 
missteps  that  were  made  many  years  ago  with  the  drug-use  prob-
lem.  We  ran  in,  in  response  to  the  sense  that  kids  were  taking 
drugs,  and  tried  to  scare  them  off.  And  it  turned  out  not  to  have 
been very effective. And it took us a decade or more before we un-
derstood  that  we  had  to  go  in  and  teach  kids  specific  drug-resist-
ance techniques, and help them by role-playing these skills. 

Senator NELSON. Well, do you think that—— 
Dr.  FINKELHOR.  And  we  need  to  go  through  that  same  proc-

ess—— 

Senator NELSON. Do you think Virginia—— 
Dr. FINKELHOR.—to try to do it earlier. 
Senator NELSON.—is on the right track? 
Dr. FINKELHOR. Do I think what? 
Senator NELSON. Virginia is on the right track? 
Dr.  FINKELHOR.  I’m  not  familiar,  entirely,  with  what  they’re 
doing,  but  my  sense  is  that  a  lot  of  the  messages  that  we’ve  got 
are  based  on  hunches  about  what  would  work,  but  we  really 
haven’t  roadtested  them  yet  to  see  if  they  actually  get  kids  to  be 
safer online. 

Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  Allen,  you  mentioned  a  number  of  addi-
tional tools that you’d like to see Congress give to law enforcement. 
Of those proposals, which are the one or two that you think are the 
most important? 

Mr.  ALLEN.  Well,  the  two  that  I  think  are  the  most  important, 
Senator Nelson, is—one, I think the Congress needs to fix the 1998 
law  that  mandates  Internet  service  providers  to  report  child  por-
nography on their system. The good news is, the major players are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

doing it willingly and aggressively. I think that’s a problem that is 
fixable by statute and needs to be fixed. 

The second thing is, I think there is a huge challenge for law en-
forcement  in  terms  of  the  connectivity  information.  I  know  that’s 
a complex issue, with—certainly with the ISP community. I’m con-
vinced  there  is  a  reasonable  resolution  that  does  not  go  after  con-
tent, but just requires preservation of those connectivity logs. 

And third—and I know this is the Commerce Committee and not 
the  Appropriations  Committee,  but  I  think  law  enforcement  needs 
help. Somebody said earlier, the sheer scale of this problem far ex-
ceeds  anything  that  we  anticipated,  and  Federal  law  enforcement, 
the  FBI’s  Innocent  Images  National  Initiative,  ICE,  and  the  agen-
cies  that  are  attacking  this  problem,  need  resources.  State  and 
local law enforcement needs resources. 

Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  just  want  to  agree  with  your 
comments  about  the  young  lady  providing  testimony.  And  I  want 
to say that, Ms. Nelson, you’re in a unique position because of what 
you  have  been  given,  the  title,  in  order  to  have  a  great  deal  of  in-
fluence  on  a  lot  of  people.  And  the  fact  that  you  have  chosen  this 
as  your  subject  area,  I  think,  should  indicate  the  highest  of  com-
pliments from us, who are concerned about this. 

Thank you. 
Ms. NELSON. Thank you very much, Senator. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Rockefeller? 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I’m  a  little  bit  mystified  by  the  whole  concept  of  educating  par-
ents and educating children, as opposed to stopping the activity, in 
the first place, through law. 

There  was  a  instance  recently  here  where  the  movie  industry 
spent $250 million—not of their own money, I might add—of trying 
to  convince  Americans  that  they  were  doing  the  best  that  they 
could on indecency, and how to use the V-chip, and all those kinds 
of things. And it was a predictable failure. It was a predictable fail-
ure. 

I agree with, I think, with what you said, Ms. Nelson, that if peo-
ple—if children—young people feel they’re being talked down to, or 
they’re being ‘‘educated’’ to achieve a higher moral standard in, sort 
of,  a  special  circumstance,  they’re  less  likely  to  listen.  I  think  par-
ents  are  more  likely  to  listen,  but  parents,  on  the  other  hand,  are 
less likely to understand what the problem is, except as their gen-
eration is younger and they’re more familiar with it. 

I mean, for example, 85 percent of parents, which is certainly the 
overwhelming  majority,  claim  to  have  implemented  rules  in  their 
homes  about  Internet  sites  their  children  can  visit.  Implemented 
rules. That’s definitive. And, additionally, a majority of parents, 53 
percent,  claim  to  have  filtering  software  to  limit  access  to  certain 
Internet  content.  Again,  that  would  seem  to  be  a  case-closed  type 
of activity. But then, at the same time, 70 to 90 percent of children 
claim  to  have  viewed  pornography  online,  much  of  it  graphically 
very  hardcore.  So,  on  the  one  hand,  we  educate,  or  we  give  people 
either—in  the  case  of  television,  V-chips  or  Internet—other  types 
of  ways  of  blocking.  And,  on  the  other  hand,  it  doesn’t  seem  to 
work.  So,  I  think  this  is  the  conundrum.  There’s  no  single  bullet. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

I think what appeals to me the most is what you suggested, and 
that is making it part of the curriculum. I don’t know, what do you 
have,  a  45–50-minute  Internet  class,  and  little  kids  start,  you 
know,  at  4  or  5  years  old,  or  3  or  4  years  old,  and  they  start,  and 
then  they  get  better  at  it.  But  they  always  have  that  available  to 
them.  And  I  think  it  ought  to  be—just  as  we  don’t  teach  physical 
fitness  anymore,  maybe  we  could  substitute  mental  stability  for 
physical  fitness,  and  at  least  not  have  people  fall  into  those  types 
of situations. 

I think children respond to what they learn in the classroom, be-
cause  it’s  sort  of  like  math  and  science.  I  mean,  it’s  likely  to  be 
right.  What  you’re  told  is  likely  to  be  right,  or  at  least  it’s  a  point 
of  view  which  is  given  to  you  by  a  figure  that  you  respect  who’s 
not  threatening  to  you—that  is  your  teacher—as  opposed  to  your 
parent, who can be put into that position. 

So, on the other hand, I have no idea that that will work either. 
I  have  no  idea  that  that  will  work  either.  And  I  just  wonder,  sev-
eral of you made your remarks, and you said we’ve got to do more 
of  this  and  more  of  this  and  more  of  this,  and  nobody  really  got, 
again,  back  to  the  people  who  are  actually  doing  it.  It  was  a  ques-
tion of how to stop something from appearing on the Internet, stop-
ping  opportunities  for  children  to  be  able  to  do  things  they 
shouldn’t, but not foreclosing—you were different, Ms. Jones, when 
you  talked  about  getting  rid  of  some  of  these  sites,  and  then  all  of 
the backlash, which I find absolutely fascinating, which I think un-
derlines  the  problem  of  the  voracious  hunger  for  this  kind  of  stuff, 
which ought to be extremely scary to all of us. 

But, to me, if you don’t want to have bad language on family pro-
gramming,  which  is  now  described  as  7:00  to  10:00,  and  children’s 
hours  are  7:00  to  10:00,  and  which  we  all  know  is  ridiculous.  I 
mean,  children  start  their  homework  at  10:00.  And  so,  they  get  to 
see  all  the  bad  stuff,  even  while  we’re  preaching  the  7:00-to-10:00 
concept.  So,  isn’t  it—actually  making  it  a  part  of  the  curriculum— 
I  don’t  know  what  you  do  about  parents,  because  I  think  parents 
are  a  very  mixed  group.  Some  want  to,  but  don’t  know  how  to.  In 
the  case  of  the  Internet,  obviously,  if  you  come  from  a  rural  State, 
West Virginia, like I do, there are a lot of parents who don’t know 
how to use the Internet, so they wouldn’t have the first idea of how 
to tell their children about what to do, or there is no Internet con-
nection  at  home.  In  the  classroom,  yes;  at  home,  no.  I  think  a  lot 
of parents are also afraid to appear to be moralistic in such direct, 
‘‘You can do this, you can do that, I’m going to block this, I’m going 
to  block  that,  this  is  why  I’m  going  do  it.’’  And  so,  that’s  a  hard 
thing  for—it’s  a  hard  intervention  for  a  parent.  It’s  a  necessary 
intervention for a parent, but, on a human basis, it’s a difficult one 
for them to make. 

So,  my  feeling,  still,  is  that  you  put  this  into  the  education,  you 
make it part of the training, and you don’t make it just for 1 year, 
you make it all throughout, so that whether you’re dealing with 5- 
year-olds  or  15-year-olds,  they’re  all  children,  and  they’re  all  sub-
ject to different people’s, you know, malevolent interests. And then, 
second, finding ways to close legal loopholes, to raise fines, or sim-
ply to make something illegal, to make something criminal. I mean, 
if  there’s  anything  that’s  criminal,  it’s  the  attacking  of  a  young 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

child,  even  the  attracting  of  a  young  child.  It’s  a  criminal  activity, 
as  far  as  I’m  concerned.  Now,  I’m  not  a  lawyer,  it  may  be  treated 
as  such,  but  I  don’t  think  so.  So  that  I  think  sometimes  we’re  too 
delicate  in  the  way  we  try  to  approach  things.  Education  is  a  very 
long-term  process.  There  are  a  lot  of  people  that  don’t  know  a 
whole lot about Shakespeare, and we’ve been teaching Shakespeare 
for two or three hundred years. 

So,  I’d  just  like  to  have  you  react  to  my  point;  that  is,  number 
one,  you  make  it  a  part  of  the  curriculum,  so  that  the  children 
themselves  ingest  in  an  atmosphere  which  they  can  trust  and  feel 
comfortable with, surrounded by their peers, therefore no bullying, 
as to how they can get into trouble; and then, after class, they dis-
cuss how some of them did get into trouble. And so, it sort of feeds 
upon itself, on the one hand; and, on the other hand, action which 
strikes  down  the  profitability  factor,  not  just  closing  in  on  the 
records,  but  figure  out  ways  to  make  it  impossible  for  people  to  do 
it. 

Mr.  NEUGENT.  Mr.  Rockefeller,  before  others  respond,  if  I  could 
just  say  that,  in  your  packet  is  Virginia’s  Internet  Safety  Guide-
lines  Curriculum.  We  certainly  concur  with  what  you’re  saying, 
Internet  safety  instruction  needs  to  be  in  the  schools,  it  needs  to 
be  in  all  of  the  curricula  areas.  And  you’ll  see  examples  in  all  of 
the major areas in Virginia. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Is  it  done  every  time  an  Internet  class  is 
taught,  is  it  done?  Is  it  done  three  times  a  week?  Is  it  done  once 
a  week?  Is  it  a  regular  part?  Does  it  go  on  for  10  or  12  years? 
That’s what I’m interested in. 

Mr. NEUGENT. Yes, in all of the curricular areas. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  It  just  never  gets—you  never  can  get 

away from it in school. 

Mr.  NEUGENT.  This  is  a  shared  responsibility  of  all  teachers. 
That’s  the  way  we  work  with  Internet  safety  in  Virginia,  so  that 
a  teacher  in  kindergarten,  first  grade,  a  history  teacher  in  ninth 
grade, all have a shared responsibility. And what we’ve tried to do 
is  to  show  them,  against  our  standards,  those  things  that  they 
should do in each of the curricula areas. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. And then they have to do it. 
Mr. NEUGENT. They have to do it. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  And  then,  are  they  monitored  by  the—— 
Mr.  NEUGENT.  Also  in  your  packet  is  a  monitoring  document  to 

check and see that it is being done. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Any other—— 
Mr.  NEUGENT.  I  don’t  think  it’s  something  we  will  have  an  an-
swer  to  immediately,  but  certainly  the  monitoring  document  will 
give answers over time—— 

Senator ROCKEFELLER.—comments? 
Mr.  NEUGENT.  I  don’t  think  it’s  enough,  it’s  just  a  start,  but  I 

know we will do more in the future. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. No, no, it’s—— 
Dr. FINKELHOR. I agree with what you’re saying, and I think that 
broadening  the  approach  across  the  curriculum  is  very  important. 
There’s  an  additional  broadening  dimension,  in  addition  to  talking 
about Internet safety: we need to be talking about Internet citizen-
ship. We can take a lesson from the community policing and crime 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

control experience. When communities were able to mobilize neigh-
borhoods  into  Neighborhood  Watches,  where  everybody  felt  a  kind 
of  responsibility  for  what  was  going  on,  reporting  things  that  they 
saw  that  were  disturbances,  behaving  well  themselves  when  they 
were  in  public  spaces,  we  cleaned  up  a  lot  of  neighborhoods.  And 
I think the Internet is a kind of neighborhood too, which needs this 
kind  of  Neighborhood  Watch  kind  of  orientation.  And  that’s  some-
thing we can be also addressing in this curriculum that you’re talk-
ing about. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Mr. Chairman, will you yield me an addi-

tional 30 seconds? 

The CHAIRMAN. Proceed. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. I want to disagree with that. I don’t want 
to  say  it’s  a  bad  idea,  but,  to  me,  there  is  such  an  enormous  dif-
ference  between  the  Neighborhood  Action  Committee,  between 
breaking  and  entering  and  permanently  either  scarring  a  child’s 
mind  or  damaging  a  child,  which  is  a  criminal  activity  of  an  en-
tirely different dimension. I meet regularly, when I go back to West 
Virginia,  with  students  and  parents  and  psychologists  and  others, 
and  school  officials,  and  we  talk  about  that.  Their  view  is  so  one- 
sidedly  in  favor  of  cracking  down,  it’s  not  even  funny.  And  I  don’t 
pick  them  out  to  reflect  the  way  I  think  about  it,  they  just  show 
up.  I  mean,  they’re  angry  about  this,  and  they  feel  helpless  about 
this.  And  if  the  parents  have  tremendous  Internet  capacity,  that’s 
terrific, but most of them don’t feel confident, or they don’t feel con-
fident  how  to  approach  their  children  on  this  thing.  And  I  think  it 
has to be a really targeted one-on-one type of thing. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Thank you, all of you, for coming. 
And I know Mr. Allen well, from the work he’s done, as a former 

prosecutor. We’ve worked together. 

And  I  will  say  that  I  look  at  this  just  from,  first,  as  a  parent, 
the challenges I’ve had. I remember the last 2 years, the only cam-
paign  question  that  stumped  me  was  at  a  teen  program.  They 
asked  me  if  I  knew  what  ‘‘LOL’’  meant.  Do  you  know  what  that 
means—— 

Ms. NELSON. Laugh—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR.—Ms. Nelson? 
Ms. NELSON.—out loud. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Exactly, laugh out loud. Well, I didn’t know 

that, and my daughter, who’s 12, reminds me of that every day. 

And one of the things I think we see is that these kids are ahead 
of  us  on  the  Internet,  and  it  means  that  we  have  to  learn  what 
we’re  doing  and  make  sure  those  standards  are  in  place.  And  I’ve 
been  impressed  by  some  of  the  work  you’ve  done,  Mr.  Allen,  on 
that, as well as the rest of the panelists. 

The  second  way  I  look  at  this  is  as  a  former  prosecutor.  And  I 
saw  these  horrific  cases  that  we  had,  where  we  would  trace  them 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

back—rapes or other cases—to where young people had met people 
over  the  Internet.  And  we  had  a  number  of  child  porn  cases,  as 
well. And one of the things I always reminded our people was that 
these  child  porn  cases,  while  it’s  a  crime  itself,  there’s  something 
sort  of  distant  about  it,  where  it  doesn’t  seem  real,  but  it  became 
very real to us when we had a case where it was just a child porn 
case, actually, against a professor. I remember, his name was Pro-
fessor Pervo—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.—and  he  had  been  looking  at  hundreds  of 
images  of  porn.  He  was  prosecuted.  There  were  some  pictures,  so 
we  were  trying  to  figure  out,  Are  these  real  kids?  Do  they  live  in 
Minnesota? Can we help them at all? And we saw—one of the pic-
tures had a high school—some kind of emblem in the back, and the 
police traced it, and they found a kid in a small town in rural Min-
nesota  who  had  basically,  been  molested,  and  he  somehow  had 
ended  up  in  this  grouping  of  pictures  that  this  professor  had  as  a 
series  of  pictures  of  child  porn.  And  it  reminded  me  again  that 
these are real children who are real victims of crimes, and not just 
images on the Internet. 

So,  I  look  at  this  in  terms  of  law  enforcement.  My  questions  are 
more along that vein. First of all, I know that we’ve had some con-
cern  in  investigating  these  cases,  about  the  data  retention  policies 
of  some  of  the  Internet  service  providers,  that  they’re  inadequate, 
and  sometimes  we’re  unable  to  get  the  information  we  need.  And 
I guess I’d ask you, Mr. Allen, or anyone else that could shed some 
light on this, What is the average time that ISPs retain this infor-
mation?  And  what  do  you  think  would  be  an  appropriate  amount 
of time? 

Mr.  ALLEN.  It  varies  widely,  and  that  really  is  the  problem. 
There  are  a  number  of  companies  that  have  been  extending  that 
retention period 30 days, 60 days, 6 months. From the law enforce-
ment  folks  that  we  talk  to,  in  our  view  it  needs  to  be  at  least  a 
year,  preferably  longer.  And,  again,  our  accommodation,  recog-
nizing  that  this  has  real  impact  on  these  companies  if  they’re  re-
quired to maintain massive amounts of data, our view is that what 
they should be required to retain are the connectivity logs. The key 
issue for law enforcement is, you have to establish that this person 
went  online  at  this  time  from  this  particular  site.  I  think  there  is 
a way to resolve this conflict without devastating the industry. But 
we  hear  it  from  our  law  enforcement  partners  across  the  country 
every day, you can’t make the cases without that basic information. 
We really have to resolve the whole data retention issue. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  And  the  other  piece  of  this,  which  you 
touched  on  is  the  training  of  police  officers.  I  just  remember  some 
cases we had early on with small police departments, where they’d 
come  upon  a  scene  and  were  investigating  a  child  porn  case.  And 
sometimes there aren’t big rings, it’s just one person or they’re try-
ing  to  figure  it  out,  and  they  get  to  the  computer,  and  they  start 
turning  it  on,  themselves,  and  turning  it  off,  and  basically  there 
were triggers in there that would ruin all the evidence that we had. 
And we did some training videos on this that were really basic. But 
I  remember,  at  some  point,  the  Federal  Government  was  offering 
to  do  these  regional  investigations  to  help  local  law  enforcement 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

with forensics and other things. And I just wondered what the sta-
tus  is  of  that.  It’s  clearly  a  problem  for  local  police  departments. 
Mr. ALLEN. It’s a huge problem. We, at the National Center, are 
bringing law enforcement in, as well as going out to do these kinds 
of  training  programs.  A  real  step  forward  in  all  this  has  been  the 
creation  of  the  Internet  Crimes  Against  Children  Task  Force  Pro-
gram. Your ICAC in Minnesota has been terrific, and has made lots 
of cases. 

Another  major  challenge  in  this  area  is  the  whole  issue  of 
forensics, because computer forensics are very demanding, are time 
consuming.  If  you  seize  a  computer  that  has  60,000  images  on  it, 
it’s  going  to  take  time  to  get  that.  I’ve  talked  to  FBI  leadership 
about  it.  One  of  the  big  challenges  now  is,  it’s  just  taking  too  long 
to  build  these  cases.  I  know  there’s  a  dollar  sign  attached  to  that, 
too,  but  we’ve  really  got  to  pay  more  attention  to  building  forensic 
capability targeted to this kind of issue. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And my last question is, Is there technology 
currently on the market or in development that can catch perpetra-
tors who rely on this peer-to-peer file-sharing networks to traffic in 
child pornography? 

Mr.  ALLEN.  The  answer  is  yes,  but  this  is  an  evolving  propo-
sition. One of the real challenges here, as you know from your time 
as  a  prosecutor,  is,  like  every  other  aspect  of  human  life,  the  bad 
guys  tend  to  get  the  new  technology  before  law  enforcement.  So, 
we’ve spent 10 years trying to help law enforcement catch up. And 
what  we’re  seeing  now  is  that,  when  you  make  headway  in  one 
area, the technology evolves. So, it is a continuing process. 

I think the most encouraging thing is that these technology com-
panies  want  to  help.  For  example,  we  are  now  working  with  AOL, 
Microsoft,  Yahoo!,  Google,  EarthLink,  and  United  Online  in  an  ef-
fort  to  develop  a  database  of  hash  values.  Basically,  each  one  of 
these  images  has  a  fingerprint;  and  a  lot  of  the  images  on  the 
Internet  are  not  new  images,  they  circulate  forever.  So,  one  of  the 
things  we’re  trying  to  do  is  work  with  technology  companies  to  try 
to  develop  new  technologies  to  identify  and  interdict  those  identi-
fied  illegal  images  and  keep  them  from  reaching  the  computers  of 
America’s consumers. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
And  I  also  wanted  to  thank  you,  Ms.  Nelson,  for  being  here.  I 
must  tell  you  that  we  had  a  case  once  when  I  was  a  prosecutor, 
a  white-collar  case,  and  one  of  your  predecessors  testified  in  favor 
of  the  defendant,  because  she  was  his  friend,  that  he  should  get  a 
lighter sentence. And I was always telling the story, for years, that 
we took him on, even though the former Miss America testified on 
his side, and that it didn’t bother me, because I was a former Miss 
Skyway News of March 1988. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  So,  I’m  just  so  pleased  that  you  are  on  our 
side,  testifying  on  this  issue,  so  that  you’ve  righted  the  name,  in 
my mind. 

Ms. NELSON. Well, thank you. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Pryor? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK L. PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Let  me  start,  if  I  may,  with  Dr.  Finkelhor.  In  your  testimony, 
and  in  your  written  testimony,  you  say  that—I  guess  you  come  to 
the conclusion that giving out personal information or participating 
in social networking sites is not the most crucial factor that places 
children at risk. Is that fair? 

Dr. FINKELHOR. That’s right. 
Senator  PRYOR.  All  right.  I’d  like  to  ask  Mr.  Allen  if  you  agree 

with that statement. 

said? 

Mr. ALLEN. We think that putting personal information out there 
puts  kids  at  risk.  I  think  what  Dr.  Finkelhor  is  saying  is  that—I 
won’t speak for Dr. Finkelhor—but that there are other factors that 
appear greater. 

We  think  there  is  abundant  evidence,  including  Dr.  Finkelhor’s 
research,  that  indicates  more  kids  are  posting  personal  informa-
tion, more kids are posting photographs today than ever before. His 
research  indicated  that  kids  are  being  more  cautious.  Fewer  kids 
are interacting with people that they don’t know. But, in our judg-
ment,  it  puts  kids  at  risk,  and  that  we  should  continue  to  work  to 
stop kids from doing it. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Dr.  Finkelhor,  do  you  agree  with  what  he  just 

Dr.  FINKELHOR.  Well,  I  think  it’s  a  generally  good  idea  to  tell 
kids,  ‘‘Be  judicious  about  what  you  do  with  personal  information, 
because  you  don’t  know  where  it’s  going  to  end  up  or  who’s  going 
to  use  it.’’  But  our  research  does  suggest  that  it’s  the  exchange  of 
personal  information,  the  posting  of  certain  elements  of  personal 
information,  like  your  Web  address,  and  things  like  that,  are  so 
widespread. And our research suggests that that’s not an indication 
of  the  kids  who  are  actually  getting  solicitations  and  getting  into 
trouble. 

The parallel, I think, to make is with kids being out on the street 
say, walking to school. It’s probably the case that if you never walk 
to  school,  your  chances  of  getting  abducted  are  reduced  somewhat, 
because  some  kids  are  going  to  get  pulled  off  the  street.  But  there 
are  other  reasons  to  be  on  the  street.  And  it’s  not  a  big  factor. 
What’s  most  important  is  to  talk  to  kids  about  what  to  do  when 
they  get  approached,  how  to  not  play  into  the  hands  of  the  solici-
tors  and  the  predators  there.  If  we  think  that  we’re  making  kids 
safe by just telling them, ‘‘Don’t post information, don’t talk to any-
body you don’t know,’’ that that’s not going to really take them very 
far on this road to protecting them. 

Senator  PRYOR.  All  right.  Well,  just  to  be  clear  for  the  Com-
mittee,  in  your  opinion  is  the  Internet  fostering  an  increase  in  in-
appropriate  contact  between  adults  and  minors?  Is  the  Internet 
adding to the problem, or is it a net neutral? 

Dr.  FINKELHOR.  Well,  that’s  a  really  good  question,  because  it 
would  seem  as  though  adults  have  greater  access  to  kids  on  the 
Internet, and the Internet has provided a kind of community forum 
for people who have these deviant sexual interests, to kind of com-
municate  with  one  another,  maybe  even  learn  from  one  another. 
But  an  interesting  fact  is  that,  during  the  same  period  when  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

Internet was penetrating into so many households over the last 10– 
12  years,  sex  crimes  against  children  have  actually  been  declining 
in this country. 

Senator PRYOR. So, is—— 
Dr.  FINKELHOR.  And  I’m  not  sure  that  it’s  the  Internet  that  has 
caused  that  decline.  In  fact,  I  don’t  think  it’s  really  been  a  part  of 
it. But it seems to me a mistake to jump to the conclusion that the 
Internet  has  made  kids  much  more  vulnerable  to  sex  crimes  than 
ever before, when you see this decline in overall sex crimes. 

Senator  PRYOR.  All  right.  In  your  opinion,  then,  is  it  fair  to  say 
that  child  predators  have,  kind  of,  moved  from  the  shopping  malls 
and  the  playgrounds  and  et  cetera,  et  cetera,  ball  fields,  et  cetera, 
to the Internet? 

Dr.  FINKELHOR.  No,  actually—for  the  people  we  consider 
pedophiles,  that  is,  people  who  have  a  primary  sexual  interest  in 
prepubescent  kids—they  really  don’t  get  much  access  to  kids  on-
line. Those kids, at that early age, are really not interested in com-
municating  with  people  online.  These  pedophiles  have  to  go 
through the traditional social networks to access kids. What it has, 
perhaps,  increased  is  access  to  teenagers,  and  particularly  those 
teenagers  who  are  vulnerable  because  they’re  in  turmoil  in  their 
lives and in search of romance and affection and understanding. 

Senator PRYOR. Interesting. 
Mr. Allen, let me ask you—and it’s good to see you again, by the 
way—but  let  me  ask  you  about—you  mentioned  something—I  be-
lieve  it  was  Senator  Bill  Nelson,  here,  a  few  moments  ago—about 
the  statute  needs  to  be  updated,  needs  to  be  fixed.  Could  you  give 
the  Committee  some  more  of  your  thoughts  on  that?  What  do  we 
need to do to the statute? 

Mr.  ALLEN.  Well,  the  Congress  mandated  Internet  service  pro-
viders to report, but regulations have never been issued by the Jus-
tice Department. The law was passed in 1998. And, while we have 
worked with the companies voluntarily—327 companies are report-
ing—the position of the Justice Department has been that this was 
a  flawed  statute  that’s  essentially  a  civil  statute  with  a  criminal 
penalty;  and,  therefore,  for  ‘‘intent’’  reasons,  nobody’s  ever  been 
sanctioned  under  the  statute.  Our  view  has  been:  If  the  statute  is 
flawed, we ought to fix it; we ought to amend it. 

And  so,  simplistically,  the  code  section  is  13032,  and  we  believe 
it’s  time—we  think  this  is  an  important  tool.  These  reports  have 
led  to  hundreds  of  successful  arrests  and  prosecutions.  And  what 
we  have  learned,  anecdotally—I  mean,  we’ve  handled  500,000  re-
ports,  but,  of  the  cases  that  we  have  handled  from  these  reports 
from  the  ISPs,  we  are  learning  that  these  are  overwhelmingly  not 
instances in which people are just downloading images and looking 
at the pictures; these are people who are downloading images, look-
ing at the pictures, fantasizing about it, and then acting physically 
against  real  kids.  So,  we  think  this  is,  in  the  scope  of  things,  I’m 
sure it’s not as big as some other issues, but we think it’s one that 
is yielding real dividends, and our concern is that, if there are only 
327  ISPs  reporting,  what  we  don’t  want  to  see  is  smaller  ISPs  be-
come  safe  havens  for  this  stuff.  So,  our  recommendation  is  that 
that  statute  be  amended  so  that  regulations  can  be  promulgated, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

and  every  electronic  service  provider  be  mandated  to  report.  And 
if they don’t, they should be sanctioned under the statute. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  I’d  like  to  work  with  you  on  that.  If  you 
all have some language or some—you know, if we can get down and 
really  look  at  the  statute  and  try  to  come  up  with  some  specifics, 
I’d really like to work with you on that. 

Mr. ALLEN. That would be great. 
Senator PRYOR. So, please be in touch on that. 
And the last thing, Ms. Jones—and I know I’m out of time here, 
but—parental  controls.  Are  parental  controls  the  answer?  I  mean, 
it  seems  to  me—I  have  a  bill  that,  you  know,  really  tries  to  do  a 
better  job  of  identifying  images,  et  cetera,  information  out  there 
that we don’t want young people to see and be exposed to. But how 
important  is  the  parent  in  this  process?  And  what  is  some  of  your 
practical  advice  of  things  we  can  be  doing,  or  should  be  doing,  as 
a Congress? 

Ms.  JONES.  There’s  no  simple  answer  to  that  question.  Parental 
controls  are  not  ‘‘the’’  answer.  Parental  controls  are  ‘‘an’’  answer. 
Amending  the  1998  statute  so  that  my  colleagues  in  the  hosting 
community actually provide data to Mr. Allen’s organization is ‘‘an’’ 
answer.  Getting  out  and  implementing  something  like  what  Vir-
ginia  has  in  schools  in  schools  is  ‘‘an’’  answer.  But  I  cannot  over-
emphasize the importance of parents being involved in this process, 
because if your kid is sitting in their bedroom looking at the Inter-
net,  and  you  don’t  know  what  they’re  looking  at,  chances  are 
they’re looking at something bad, just like everything else your kid 
does  in  the  bedroom  with  the  door  closed  without  you  knowing 
about  it.  Kids  push  boundaries,  and  so,  the  parent  has  to  be  in-
volved. 

Some  parental  controls  that  are  available  work.  Some  of  the  fil-
tering  works.  If  the  technology  coalition  that  the  National  Center 
has put together actually gets this database of known images, that 
will  be  hugely  helpful.  I  can  go  bump  up  against  our  database  of 
thousands  upon  thousands  upon  thousands  of  computers  with  mil-
lions  of  hosting  accounts,  clean  the  entire  thing  of  every  image 
that’s in that data base. That’s a filter. That’s helpful. But the par-
ent  has  to  put  the  filter  on  the  computer  of  the  kid  that’s  looking 
at it in order for what I just did to make it effective. 

I  think  no  matter  what  we  do,  it’s  always  going  to  come  back  to 
the  user.  And  I  know  Senator  Rockefeller  was  uncomfortable  with 
that,  because  it  seems  like  we’re  putting  the  burden  on  kids  and 
parents  to  do  the  right  thing,  and  we’re  letting  the  criminals  run 
free. That’s not the case at all. We get phone calls every single day 
from  law  enforcement  all  over  the  country  who  are  pursuing  the 
‘‘bad guys.’’ Yesterday, in Florida, 22 people were arrested in a case 
that we helped with in a child pornography ring. That stuff is also 
happening—that’s another sort of parallel line that’s going on. But 
you’ve got to have the parents involved. I cannot overemphasize it. 
And  if  you’re  a  kid,  and  your  parent  doesn’t  know  how  to  use  the 
Internet, teach ’em how to use it. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Cantwell? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
And  thank  all  the  panelists  for  being  here,  and,  Mr.  Chairman, 

for holding this Committee. 

Could we talk about statistics for a minute? Because I know that 
some were mentioned, but I want to understand—I think, in 2004, 
there  were  reports  of  200,000  online  child  pornography  cases.  Do 
we know, Mr. Allen or others, if that has increased? This was part 
of  the  International  Center  for  Missing  &  Exploited  Children’s 
data. 

Mr. ALLEN. Right. We—— 
Senator  CANTWELL.  And  that  was,  one  in  five  children  ages  10 

through 17 has been solicited online—— 

Mr. ALLEN. That—— 
Senator CANTWELL.—for unwanted sexual advances. So—— 
Mr.  ALLEN.  The  one-in-five  data  were  from  Dr.  Finkelhor’s  re-
search,  which  the  University  of  New  Hampshire  conducted  for  the 
National Center in 2000. The good news is, his most recent version 
of  that  indicated  that  that  number  has  gotten  a  little  better.  It’s 
now one in seven. 

In terms of child pornography cases, we don’t have the same kind 
of  scientific  data.  What  I  can  report  to  you  is  that  the  numbers  of 
child  pornography  reports  received  by  the  National  Center  for 
Missing & Exploited Children are up dramatically. 

The  other  thing  that  we’re  seeing  from  those  reports  is  that  the 
victims  are  getting  younger.  Again,  citing  Dr.  Finkelhor’s  research 
from  a  couple  of  years  ago  looking  at  offenders,  what  we’ve  found 
is  that  most  people  don’t  understand  what  the  true  composition  of 
this  issue  is.  His  research  found  that  39  percent  of  the  offenders 
who  were  identified  had  images  of  children  younger  than  6  years 
old;  19  percent,  younger  than  3.  Many  people  think  this  is  a  prob-
lem of 20-year-olds in pigtails made to look like they’re 15. It’s not. 
Overwhelmingly, the demand is for prepubescent children, and the 
numbers are getting younger and younger. 

Senator CANTWELL. So, if you were going to say the decrease of— 
in  fact,  if  it  is  a  decrease—and,  you  know,  you  never  know  what’s 
going  on;  it  may  be  that  people  have  gotten  better  at  hiding  the 
contacts  or  who  knows,  maybe  software  on  the  other  side,  and 
encryption technology, who knows what’s happening. But, let’s say, 
for example—for sure there is an improvement in the situation. To 
what do we think we can attribute the effort that led to that reduc-
tion? 

Dr. FINKELHOR. One of the things that we found was that young 
people,  between  2000  and  2005,  when  we  did  our  two  surveys,  re-
ported  they  were  going  to  chat  rooms  less,  that  they  were  talking 
to  people  that  they  don’t  know  less,  and  it  suggested  that  actually 
they had gotten some of the prevention education messages that we 
had been putting out, and that was the good news. 

I  don’t  want  to  put  too  much  stock  in  the  decline  from  the  one 
in  five  to  the  one  in  seven.  We  didn’t  see  a  change  in  the  number 
of  kids  who  were  experiencing  what  we  call  ‘‘aggressive  solicita-
tions.’’  Those  were  the  really  endangering  ones,  where  the  person 
who  was  soliciting  them  tried  to  make  contact  with  them  offline, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

in addition to the computer communication. That stayed at around 
4 percent. Those are the ones that concern me, that one in 20. Most 
of  the  kids  are  handling  those  pretty  well,  the  other  ones,  that 
don’t  involve  these  aggressive  solicitations.  Unfortunately,  the  ag-
gressive solicitations did not decline. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And,  Mr.  Allen,  I’m  assuming  that  the  Na-

tional Center does work with the International Center on—— 

Mr. ALLEN. Yes. 
Senator CANTWELL.—on these efforts, since the Internet is global 

and—— 

Mr. ALLEN. Absolutely. 
Senator  CANTWELL.—and  so,  that  connectivity  issue  and  data 
storage issue is being addressed on an international basis, because 
you don’t want to just chase the problem to some server somewhere 
else  that  isn’t  regulated.  So,  are  we  working  on  that,  on  an  inter-
national basis? 

Mr.  ALLEN.  Senator  Cantwell,  we’re  working  on  it.  In  fact,  you 
helped  us  launch  our  partnership  with  Interpol  on  that.  The  great 
challenge,  internationally,  is  that  we  reviewed  the  law  in  the  186 
member  countries  of  Interpol,  and  we  found  that  95  of  them  have 
no  law  at  all,  child  pornography  is  not  even  a  crime.  And  in  136 
of the member countries of Interpol, the possession of child pornog-
raphy is not a crime. It is a real challenge, because, in much of the 
world—this  is  now  an  issue  in  which  Eastern  European  organized 
crime is very much involved, because it’s so easy and so profitable. 
And  we  have  great  work  we  need  to  do  work  to  change  the  law 
around  the  world  and  build  capacity.  With  Interpol,  we’ve  now 
trained law enforcement in 100 countries to build capacity—— 

Senator CANTWELL. And do—— 
Mr. ALLEN.—but there’s a long way—— 
Senator CANTWELL. And do you have—— 
Mr. ALLEN.—to go. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  And  do  you  have  data  from  that,  Mr.  Allen, 

about the success of that? Do you have any statistics from that? 

Mr. ALLEN. From the legislative research? 
Senator CANTWELL. No, from that 2004 Interpol effort of training 
law  enforcement  to  identify  an  online  crime  scene,  so  they  could 
better  find  the  perpetrators.  That  training,  which  I  did  applaud,  I 
thought was a useful effort, particularly given, again, that so much 
of these activities, from an international basis, are going to impact 
us here in the United States. We can do a really good job of trying 
to  clean  things  up  here,  but,  if  we’re  seeing  Websites,  you  know, 
from all over the globe—— 

Mr. ALLEN. Absolutely. We—— 
Senator CANTWELL. So—— 
Mr.  ALLEN.—can  certainly  get  you  the  data  that  was  generated. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  So,  do  you  think  that  that’s  worked,  this— 
here’s my point. I think everybody’s doing great work, but we defi-
nitely  have  an  enormous  task  in  front  of  us,  and  we’re  only  going 
to have increases in communication and technology. We do want to 
use that to our advantage. But, measuring what—to the best of our 
degree—what is being successful, so that we can invest more in it, 
I think, is critical, at this early stage. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

Mr. ALLEN. I agree. And there’s very little research, or very little 
empirical  data,  on  this  issue  outside  the  United  States,  and  that’s 
a real challenge. 

Dr.  FINKELHOR.  And  even  the  information  that  we  have  within 
the  United  States,  I’m  afraid,  is  woefully  inadequate,  in  many  re-
spects, for tracking what’s going on. I would just contrast the infor-
mation that we have on infectious diseases, for example, which are 
another  threat  to  the  public,  but  we  have  tremendous  information 
about infectious agents and accidents that we can track, over time, 
to see how we’re doing. In the crimes-against-children area, we are 
woefully  lacking,  with  just  general  epidemiological  information,  on 
some of the things that are most frightening to families, like abduc-
tions  and  Internet  crimes  against  kids,  and  we  could  really  im-
prove. And it would answer some of the questions that you’re inter-
ested in, I think. 

Senator CANTWELL. Well, I think it’s very important. 
Again,  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  the  hearing,  and  thank  ev-
erybody  on  the  panel  for  your  hard  work.  But  we  obviously  have 
a lot more work to do. 

Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
I’ve  been  listening  intently  to  the  testimony.  And,  according  to 
reports that we have gathered, about 5 years ago there were about 
100,000  child  pornography  Websites.  Today,  I  think  they  get  close 
to  400,000.  At  the  same  time,  over  70  percent  of  children,  teen-
agers,  preteenagers,  have  viewed  child  pornography  on  the  Inter-
net.  At  the  same  time,  we  have  statistics  that  suggest  that  the 
American  family,  67  percent  have  both  parents  living  with  their 
children,  the  remainder  are  either  living  in  homes,  institutions,  or 
with  single  parents,  or  with  grandparents.  At  the  same  time,  sta-
tistics  suggest  to  us  that  most  of  these  single  parents  are  so  over-
whelmed  with  trying  to  make  a  living,  they  spend  very  little  time 
with  their  kids.  And  I  believe  in  parental  involvement,  but  these 
numbers  suggest  that,  for  many  of  our  kids,  parental  involvement 
does not exist. And so, I am concerned about what the Federal Dis-
trict Court in Utah did—making one of those laws unconstitutional. 
What  I’d  like  to  know  is,  What  can  we  do—and  maybe  this  is  in 
the  jurisdiction  of  the  Judiciary  Committee—to  toughen  the  laws? 
Now,  for  the  record,  what  are  the  punishments  that  we  have  in 

the books, at this time? 

Mr. ALLEN. Well, Senator, the Congress, certainly on Federal of-
fenses,  over  the  past  several  years  has  increased  penalties  signifi-
cantly.  And  I  think  that’s  been  a  huge  step  forward.  The  States 
have some more work to do. 

On  the  issue  you  raised  about  the  Utah  court  decision,  my  reac-
tion  certainly  is  one  of  discouragement.  This  Congress  has  tried 
very  hard  to  address  this  issue  with  governmental  solutions,  lim-
iting  the  access,  filtering  and  blocking  and  keeping  kids  from 
reaching this kind of content, or content reaching them. 

Frankly, I think my judgment is that one of the things this Com-
merce Committee can do is to encourage and promote more private- 
sector innovation, because there are tools that are being developed. 
Ms.  Jones  talked  about  some  of  the  leadership  within  the  tech-
nology industry. I think there are tools that are being developed on 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

the  private  side  that  should  be  encouraged,  should  be  examined, 
and we should begin to try to implement them. 

Frankly,  the  courts  have  sent  a  pretty  loud-and-clear  message, 
and that message is, they’re going to look very carefully at govern-
mental  regulatory  mandates  in  some  of  the  areas.  And  I  think 
what  the  Congress  has  to  do  is  look  for  a  balanced  approach,  not 
that  previous  approaches  weren’t—but  a  more  balanced  approach 
that put greater emphasis on private-sector tools and private-sector 
innovation. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  How  can  we  convince  our  parents  that  what  is 
involved  here  is  serious,  dangerous,  and  will  just  eventually  break 
up  families?  What  can  we  do?  Can  we  do  anything,  legislatively? 
Mr.  ALLEN.  Well,  Mr.  Chairman,  our  view,  from  the  beginning, 
has  been  that  this  is  a  three-pronged  process.  One,  the  kind  of  ac-
tivity we’re talking about, almost without exception, is illegal. And 
so,  I  think  law  enforcement—an  increased  emphasis  on  law  en-
forcement  to  identify  those  who  are  misusing  the  Internet  for  un-
lawful purposes, is more important than ever before. 

Second, I think we have to continue the drumbeat to try to moti-
vate  America’s  parents,  and  awaken  them.  We  live  in  a  unique 
time, in which kids know more about a transcendent technology in 
our lives than do their parents. There are some terrific models and 
programs  out  here.  Jackie  Leavitt,  the  wife  of  the  HHS  Secretary, 
is  here  with  us  this  morning.  She  has  mobilized  the  Nation’s  first 
ladies around a program called iKeep Safe. There is a terrific train-
ing  program  that’s  gone  into  schools  across  the  country,  called  i- 
SAFE.  We,  at  the  National  Center,  created,  with  Boys  and  Girls 
Clubs  of  America,  an  interactive  online  educational  tool,  called 
NetSmartz, with animation for younger kids. There are great tools 
out there. The Virginia model of mainstreaming it, of institutional-
izing  it,  for  making  it  a  part  of  ongoing  educational  curricula,  I 
think, is real important. So, we have to continue to emphasize and 
promote prevention and education. 

But,  third,  I  think  the  ultimate  answer  to  a  lot  of  this  problem, 
frankly,  is  rooted  in  technology.  The  softwares  have  not  yet  been 
developed that can automatically identify, interdict, prevent certain 
kinds  of  issues.  Members  of  this  Committee  talked,  this  morning, 
about  the  concern  about  a  hands-off  approach.  I  think  if  we  con-
tinue to promote technology innovation to develop tools that can be 
used  to  prevent  the  most  heinous  of  these  problems,  while  empha-
sizing  education  in  the  classroom  as  an  ongoing  and  integral  part 
of  what  kids  are  taught  and  what  they  learn,  continue  the  efforts 
to  reach  out  to  parents,  recognize  it’s  hard,  but  we’ve  got  to  do  it, 
and  then  give  law  enforcement  the  tools  and  the  resources  they 
need  to  go  after,  and  prosecute,  the  ‘‘bad  guys’’.  The  good  news  is, 
there  have  been  thousands  of  them  brought  to  justice.  The  bad 
news  is,  there  are  far  more  of  them  than  we  thought  there  were. 
And the reality is, as someone raised earlier, the Internet does cre-
ate a situation where people can be anonymous, they can fantasize 
in the privacy of their own homes, they have little risk of detection. 
That’s something we have to deal with. 

The CHAIRMAN. Any closing remarks here? 
Miss America? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

Ms.  NELSON.  Again,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  for  allowing 
me to be here to speak on this issue. I feel that the legislation has 
been  put  in  place,  that  there  are  things  being  done  that  are  the 
step in the right direction, but there is more that we can do. Again, 
I  want  to  promote  education,  because  I  feel  that  education  on  this 
issue will help to keep our kids, and help them from being the vic-
tims  in  the  first  place.  If  we  can  police  the  Internet  on  our  side  of 
the keyboard, I think that’s the best way to go about this issue. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Dr. Finkelhor? 
Dr. FINKELHOR. I want to thank you, also, for the opportunity to 
address  the  Committee,  and  also  appreciate  your  interest  in  this 
topic. 

My  final  remark  is  that  the  vulnerability  of  children  on  the 
Internet  is  an  extension  of  their  vulnerability  in  every  aspect  of 
their lives, and we should not ignore that, as well, as we try to face 
the risks that are posed online. But children are still being bullied 
in  school,  sexually  abused  in  their  families,  and  they  are  still  wit-
nessing domestic violence in their homes. And this is all part of one 
fabric and in order to address victimization online, we also need to 
address some of these other issues, as well. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Allen? 
Mr. ALLEN. Just, finally, Mr. Chairman, thank you for the oppor-
tunity,  and  thank  you  for  your  extraordinary  leadership  and  com-
mitment on this issue. This is timely, and it’s important. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Neugent? 
Mr.  NEUGENT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  also,  for  allowing  me 
to  speak  today.  I  do  believe  that  education  is  one  of  the  answers, 
and  we  will  continue  to  pursue  that  in  Virginia.  We  will  continue 
to  work  with  the  attorney  general’s  task  force.  And  we  hope,  at 
some  point,  to  have  information  to  show  that,  in  effect,  our  pro-
grams are working. 

Thank you very much. 
The CHAIRMAN. Ms. Jones? 
Ms. JONES. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I’m  sure  you  know,  but  your  staff,  James  Assey  and  Margaret 
Cummisky and the people that work behind you, are tirelessly pur-
suing  this,  that  the  staff  members  of  every  Committee  member 
here  that  we’ve  met  with  who  pursue  this  issue  are.  We  are  pro-
foundly  grateful  for  that,  because,  we  feel  like  we’re  out  on  the 
front  line,  trying  to  defend  this  thing.  It’s  nice  to  know  that  some-
body in Washington is paying attention to it. 

It  seems  like  a  noncontroversial  issue,  nonpartisan.  Nobody 
thinks  child  predators  are  a  good  idea.  So,  we  would  continue  to 
urge  passage  of  the  McCain-Schumer  child  pornography  bill,  the 
bill  that  Senator  Pryor  mentioned,  in  regards  to  online  parental 
controls.  Any  of  the  tools  that  are  small  steps  in  the  overall  solu-
tion, we would encourage this Committee to continue to pursue. 

But, most importantly, just thank you so much for taking a look 
at  the  issue  and  for  making  it  a  priority  at  the  end  of  a  session 
and on a hot summer day, when you might be off doing something 
else. So, we are just profoundly grateful for that. 

Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

The  CHAIRMAN.  Obviously,  there’s  much  to  be  done.  And  we’re 

44 

not quite knowledgeable as to what should be done. 

But,  Mr.  Allen,  we  will  find  out.  And  I  promise  all  of  you  that 
we’ll  make  it  tougher,  we’ll  get  more  parents  involved,  we’ll  have 
PTAs  involved.  And  that  has  been  a  concern  of  mine.  I  used  to  at-
tend  PTA  meetings,  as  a  Member  of  Congress,  which  meant  I  had 
to  miss  some  votes.  But,  today,  in  a  school  of,  say,  500  children, 
if you have 50 parents at a PTA meeting, you are doing very well, 
which is sad. It wasn’t so in my days of youth. But I suppose, with 
all  the  advancement  and  technology  advancements,  we  don’t  need 
these things. But I think they’re wrong. Parents must get involved. 

And I thank you all very much for your contribution. 
The session is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:52 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:36 Jan 09, 2012 Jkt 072157 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\72157.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

